ENGINEERING  THE  CLIMATE: 

RESEARCH  NEEDS  AND  STRATEGIES 
FOR  INTERNATIONAL  COORDINATION

COMMITTEE  PRINT

BY THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND 

TECHNOLOGY 

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  ELEVENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

OCTOBER  2010

Serial No. 111–A

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology.  This  document 
has  been  printed  for  informational  purposes  only  and  does  not  represent  ei-
ther  findings  or  recommendations  adopted  by  this  Committee.

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov 

62–619PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY 

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman 

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas 
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR., 

Wisconsin 

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas 
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California 
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland 
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan 
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma 
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois 
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri 
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas 
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina 
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas 
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida 
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California 
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska 
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia 
PETE  OLSON,  Texas 

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois 
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas 
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California 
DAVID  WU,  Oregon 
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington 
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina 
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois 
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona 
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland 
MARCIA  L.  FUDGE,  Ohio 
BEN  R.  LUJA´ N,  New  Mexico 
PAUL  D.  TONKO,  New  York 
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey 
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah 
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee 
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky 
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri 
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana 
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona 
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio 
KATHLEEN  DAHLKEMPER,  Pennsylvania 
ALAN  GRAYSON,  Florida 
SUZANNE  M.  KOSMAS,  Florida 
GARY  C.  PETERS,  Michigan 
JOHN  GARAMENDI,  California 
VACANCY 

(II)

FOREWORD 

Climate  engineering,  also  known  as  geoengineering,  can  be  de-
scribed  as  the  deliberate  large-scale  modification  of  the  earth’s  cli-
mate  systems  for  the  purposes  of  counteracting  and  mitigating  cli-
mate change. As this subject becomes the focus of more serious con-
sideration  and  scrutiny  within  the  scientific  and  policy  commu-
nities, it is important to acknowledge that climate engineering car-
ries  with  it  not  only  possible  benefits,  but  also  an  enormous  range 
of uncertainties, ethical and political concerns, and the potential for 
harmful environmental and economic side-effects. I believe that re-
ducing greenhouse gas emissions should be the first priority of any 
domestic or international climate initiative. Nothing should distract 
us  from  this  priority,  and  climate  engineering  must  not  divert  any 
of  the  resources  dedicated  to  greenhouse  gas  reductions  and  clean 
energy  development.  However,  we  are  facing  an  unfortunate  re-
ality.  The  global  climate  is  already  changing  and  the  onset  of  cli-
mate  change  impacts  may  outpace  the  world’s  political,  technical, 
and  economic  capacities  to  prevent  and  adapt  to  them.  Therefore, 
policymakers  should  begin  consideration  of  climate  engineering  re-
search  now  to  better  understand  which  technologies  or  methods,  if 
any, represent viable stopgap strategies for managing our changing 
climate and which pose unacceptable risks.

‘‘We  need  the  research  now  to  establish  whether  such  approaches  can  do 
more good than harm. This research will take time. We cannot wait to ready 
such systems until an emergency is upon us.’’

—Dr. Ken Caldeira, Geoengineering: Assessing the Implications of Large-

Scale Climate Intervention (written hearing testimony) (2009).

Likewise, the impact of a moratorium on research should be care-
fully  weighed  against  the  importance  of  promoting  scientific  free-
dom  and  accountability.  Scientific  research  and  risk  assessment  is 
essential to developing an adequate scientific basis on which to jus-
tify  or  prohibit  any  action  related  to  climate  change,  including  cli-
mate  engineering  activities.  Sound  science  should  be  used  to  sup-
port  decision  making  at  all  levels,  including  rigorous  and  exhaus-
tive  examination  of  both  the  dangers  and  the  value  of  individual 
climate  engineering  strategies.  A  research  moratoria  that  stifles 
science,  especially  at  this  stage  in  our  understanding  of  climate 
engineering’s  risks  and  benefits,  is  a  step  in  the  wrong  direction 
and undercuts the importance of scientific transparency. The global 
community  is  best  served  by  research  that  is  both  open  and  ac-
countable. If climate change is indeed one of the greatest long-term 
threats  to  biological  diversity  and  human  welfare,  then  failing  to 
understand  all  of  our  options  is  also  a  threat  to  biodiversity  and 
human welfare. 

There  is  no  clear  consensus  as  to  which  types  of  activities  fall 
within the definition of climate engineering. For example, most ex-

(III)

IV

of 

this 

perts  on  land-based  strategies  for  biological  sequestration  of  car-
bon,  such  as  afforestation,  do  not  identify  the  activities  they  study 
as  climate  engineering.  The  definition  of  the  term  also  depends 
somewhat on the context in which it is used. For the purpose of de-
veloping regulations, for instance, the term may apply to a smaller 
set  of  higher-risk  strategies  than  might  otherwise  be  included  for 
the  purpose  of  crafting  a  broad  interagency  or  international  re-
search  initiative.  In  the  interest  of  simplicity  and  consistency,  the 
criteria  used  in  this  report  are  modeled  off  of  the  U.K.  Royal  Soci-
ety  Report,  Geoengineering  the  Climate:  Science,  Governance  and 
Uncertainty.1 These  criteria  are  inclusive  of  lower-risk  activities 
such  as  reflective  roofs,  some  types  of  carbon  capture  and  seques-
tration,  and  distributed  land  management  strategies,  as  well  as 
more controversial proposals such as ocean fertilization and atmos-
pheric aerosol injection. 

‘‘geoengineering’’ 

Readers may notice that I use the term ‘‘climate engineering’’ in-
stead 
report.  While 
‘‘geoengineering’’  is  the  term  more  commonly  used  to  describe  this 
category of activities, I feel that it does not accurately or fully con-
vey  the  scale  and  intent  of  these  proposals,  and  it  may  simply  be 
confusing to many stakeholders unfamiliar with the subject. There-
fore, for the purposes of clarity, facilitating public engagement, and 
acknowledging the seriousness of the task at hand, this report will 
use  the  term  ‘‘climate  engineering’’  in  lieu  of  ‘‘geoengineering’’ 
going forward. 

throughout 

This  report  is  informed  by  an  extensive  review  of  proposed  cli-
mate  engineering  strategies  and  their  potential  impacts,  including 
a  joint  inquiry  between  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives  Com-
mittee  on  Science  and  Technology  and  the  United  Kingdom  House 
of Commons Science and Technology Committee (hereafter referred 
to as the ‘‘U.S. Committee’’ and the ‘‘U.K. Committee’’), three Con-
gressional  hearings,  review  of  scientific  research  relevant  to  cli-
mate engineering, and discussions with a number of experts, stake-
holder groups, scientists and managers at federal agencies, and the 
Government Accountability Office (GAO). 

and  Coordination 

As  noted  in  the  attached  joint  agreement  between  the  U.S.  and 
U.K.  Committees,  Collaboration 
on 
Geoengineering,2 the U.S. Committee investigated the research and 
development  challenges  associated  with  climate  engineering,  while 
the  U.K.  Committee  focused  on  regulatory  and  international  gov-
ernance  issues.  Striking  the  right  balance  between  research  and 
regulation is critical as both should develop, to some degree, in par-
allel. Regulatory processes must be based on sound scientific infor-
mation, and some climate engineering research will require regula-
tion  and  government  oversight.  Furthermore,  development  of  a 
comprehensive  risk  assessment  framework  to  weigh  the  potential 
public benefits of climate engineering against its potential dangers 
will be needed to inform decision makers and the public as policies 
are crafted for research and possible deployment. 

Equally important in the development of policies for climate engi-
neering  research  will  be  transparency  and  public  engagement.  For 

1 JOHN SHEPHERD ET AL., GEOENGINEERING THE CLIMATE: SCIENCE, GOVERNANCE AND UNCER-

TAINTY (The U.K. Royal Society) (2009). 

2 See infra Appendix at p.47. 

V

this reason, both the U.S. and U.K. Committees have sought to es-
tablish  an  official  record  through  public  proceedings  with  relevant 
background  materials  posted  online.  Just  as  full-scale  deployment 
of  climate  engineering  would  necessarily  have  global  effects,  some 
large-scale  field  research  activities  will  impact  multiple  commu-
nities and cross international borders. Furthermore, the impacts of 
climate engineering may be felt most by less economically-advanced 
populations  that  are  particularly  vulnerable  to  climatic  changes, 
deliberate  or  otherwise.  Widespread  public  understanding  and  ac-
ceptance  is  fundamental  to  any  climate  engineering  policy  that  is 
both socially equitable and politically feasible. 

It  is  my  intent  that  this  report,  the  U.S.  and  U.K.  Committees’ 
hearing records, the reports from GAO, and other forthcoming doc-
uments  will  make  key  contributions  to  the  evolving  global  con-
versation on climate engineering and help guide future government 
and academic structures for research and development activities in 
this  field.  In  addition,  the  bilateral  cooperation  between  the  U.S. 
and  U.K.  Committees  on  this  topic  should  serve  as  a  model  for  fu-
ture  inter-parliamentary  collaboration.  As  nations  become  more 
technologically, economically, and ecologically interdependent, mul-
tilateral collaboration will be critical to developing policies that ad-
dress an increasingly complex range of challenges.

Congressman Bart Gordon, Chairman 
Committee on Science and Technology 
United States House of Representatives 

C O N T E N T S 

October  2010

Foreword ...................................................................................................................
Table of Contents .....................................................................................................
Background ..............................................................................................................
Summary of Hearings .............................................................................................
Research Needs ........................................................................................................
U.S. Research Capacities ........................................................................................
National Science Foundation ...........................................................................
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration ......................................
Department of Energy ......................................................................................
National Aeronautics and Space Administration ..........................................
Environmental Protection Agency ...................................................................
U.S. Department of Agriculture ......................................................................
Other Federal Agencies ....................................................................................
Organizational Models ............................................................................................
General Findings and Recommendations ..............................................................
Additional Sources ...................................................................................................

Page 
III
VII
1
3
7
8
9
12
17
22
26
28
30
32
37
45

United States–United Kingdom Joint Agreement ................................................

47

Appendix

(VII)

Engineering the Climate: Research Needs

and Strategies for International Coordination 

This document has been developed by the Chairman and staff of 
the U.S. House of Representatives Committee on Science and Tech-
nology,  for  use  by  the  Members  of  the  Committee,  the  United 
States  Congress,  and  the  public.  It  has  not  been  reviewed  or  ap-
proved  by  the  Members  of  the  Committee  and  may  therefore  not 
necessarily reflect the views of all Members of the Committee. This 
document  has  been  printed  for  informational  purposes  only  and 
does  not  represent  either  findings  or  recommendations  adopted  by 
the Committee. 

This report should not be construed to provide any binding or au-
thoritative analysis of any statute. This report also does not reflect 
the legal position of the United States.

BACKGROUND 

During the 111th Congress, the U.S. Committee launched an ini-
tiative  to  better  understand  the  issues  surrounding  climate  engi-
neering,  and  collaborated  with  the  U.K.  Committee  to  explore  the 
subject. The U.S. Committee convened three public hearings to ex-
plore  the  science,  governance,  risks,  and  research  needs  associated 
with  climate  engineering.  A  summary  of  each  hearing  follows  this 
section. 

This  report  consolidates  information  gathered  during  eighteen 
months  of  inquiry,  and  focuses  on  the  research  needs  associated 
with  climate  engineering.  It  identifies  key  research  capacities, 
skills,  and  tools  located  within  U.S.  federal  agencies  that  could  be 
leveraged  to  inform  climate  engineering  science  responsibly.  In-
cluded  throughout  the  report  are  recommendations  of  the  Chair  in 
bold text. 

Climate engineering, or geoengineering, can be defined as the de-
liberate  large-scale  modification  of  the  earth’s  climate  systems  for 
the  purpose  of  counteracting  and  mitigating  anthropogenic  climate 
change.  The  strategies  which  fall  under  this  definition  are  loosely 
organized into two types: Solar Radiation Management and Carbon 
Dioxide  Removal.  Solar  Radiation  Management  (SRM)  methods 
propose to reflect a fraction of the sun’s radiation back into space,3 
thereby  reducing  the  amount  of  solar  radiation  trapped  in  the 
earth’s atmosphere and stabilizing its energy balance. Carbon Diox-
ide Removal (CDR) methods, also known as Air Capture (AC), pro-
pose to reduce excess CO2 concentrations by capturing CO2 directly 

3 The  proposed  reductions  in  global  solar  radiation  absorption  are  usually  1–2%;  around  30% 
is already reflected naturally by the earth’s surface and atmosphere. See Geoengineering: Assess-
ing the Implications of Large-Scale Climate Intervention Hearing Before the House of Representa-
tives Committee on Science and Technology, 111th Cong. (2009) (Hearing Charter). 

(1)

2

from the air and storing the captured gases as a solid through min-
eralization,  or  consuming  it  via  biological  processes.  CDR  is  dif-
ferent from direct capture, which targets carbon from a single point 
source  and  stores  it  in  sedimentary  formations.  A  comprehensive 
discussion of the variety of proposed strategies can be found in the 
U.K.  Royal  Society  report,  discussed  below,  although  it  is  expected 
that some proposals for climate engineering will continue to evolve 
into completely new technical concepts over time. 

While  proposals  for  climate  engineering  in  some  form  have  been 
around  for  decades,  climate  change  research  and  regulation  efforts 
have  been  almost  wholly  focused  on  mitigation  through  emissions 
reductions and, more recently, adaptation to the effects of a chang-
ing  climate.  Because  of  the  inherent  risks  and  uncertainties,  cli-
mate  engineering,  thus  far,  has  not  represented  a  technically  via-
ble,  environmentally  sound,  or  politically  prudent  option  for  pre-
venting  or  adapting  to  climate  change.  However,  in  recent  years  a 
growing  number  of  credible  scientific  bodies  have  engaged  in  more 
serious deliberation to the concept of climate engineering. 

In  September  of  2009  the  U.K.  Royal  Society  published  a  com-
prehensive  report  entitled,  Geoengineering  the  Climate:  Science, 
Governance  and  Uncertainty.4 In  May  2010  the  National  Research 
Council  released  a  pre-publication  version  of  a  congressionally  re-
quested  report,  America’s  Climate  Choices,5 which  included  discus-
sion  on  several  carbon  dioxide  removal  strategies.  In  the  spring  of 
2010 the bipartisan National Commission on Energy Policy (NCEP) 
announced  its  formation  of  a  Task  Force  on  Geoengineering  to  ex-
plore  U.S.  governmental  approaches  to  research  and  governance 
issues.  Since  the  U.S.  Committee  began  its  inquiry,  at  least  three 
books dedicated exclusively to the topic of climate engineering have 
been  released.  Following  on  to  its  previous  efforts,  the  U.K.  Royal 
Society,  in  partnership  with  the  Environmental  Defense  Fund 
(EDF) and the Academy of Sciences for the Developing World, initi-
ated  the  Solar  Radiation  Management  Governance  Initiative 
(SRMGI)  to  ensure  strict  and  appropriate  governance  of  any  plans 
for solar radiation management. 

In  addition  to  these  efforts,  the  U.S.  Committee  commissioned 
both  the  Congressional  Research  Service  (CRS)  and  the  Govern-
ment  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  to  conduct  their  own  inquiries. 
CRS  reviewed  the  international  treaties,  laws  and  other  existing 
regulatory  frameworks  that  might  apply  if  climate  engineering 
were  tested  or  deployed  at  a  large  scale.  This  report  was  released 
on  March  11,  2010  and  is  contained  in  its  entirety  as  part  of  the 
official  Committee  hearing  records.6 A  second  report  was  released 
by  CRS  in  August  2010  containing  a  more  detailed  consideration 
of the potential regulatory issues of climate engineering.7 GAO con-
ducted  a  Committee-requested  assessment  of  the  current  federal 
agency  research  activities  directly  related  to  climate  engineering. 

4 JOHN SHEPHERD ET AL., GEOENGINEERING THE CLIMATE: SCIENCE, GOVERNANCE AND UNCER-

TAINTY (The U.K. Royal Society) (2009). 

5 DIVISION ON EARTH AND LIFE SCIENCES,  NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL,  AMERICA’S CLIMATE 
CHOICES:  ADVANCING THE SCIENCE OF CLIMATE CHANGE p.299  (National  Academies  Press) 
(2010). 

6 H.R. REP. NOS. 111–62, 111–75, 111–88 (2010). 
7 KELSI BRACMORT ET AL.,  GEOENGINEERING:  GOVERNANCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY (U.S. 

Congressional Research Service) (2010). 

3

This  GAO  inquiry  focused  on  the  general  state  of  the  science  and 
technology  regarding  climate  engineering  approaches  and  their  po-
tential  effects,  the  extent  to  which  the  U.S.  federal  government  is 
sponsoring  or  participating  in  climate  engineering  research  or  de-
ployment,  the  views  of  legal  experts  and  federal  officials  regarding 
the  extent  to  which  federal  laws  and  international  agreements 
apply  to  climate  engineering  activities,  and  some  of  the  associated 
governance  challenges.  This  report,  A  Coordinated  Strategy  Could 
Focus Federal Geoengineering Research and Inform Governance Ef-
forts,  was  released  in  October  2010.8 Also  at  the  Chairman’s  re-
quest, a separate group of scientists and engineers within GAO are 
conducting a technology assessment on various climate engineering 
strategies  and  the  related  technical  and  societal  considerations, 
with a report on their process and findings expected in early 2011. 
This GAO effort will include a survey of the knowledge base within 
the  scientific  community  about  leading  climate  engineering  ap-
proaches,  the  public’s  general  perception  of  those  approaches,  and 
the prospects for their potential development. 

SUMMARY OF HEARINGS 

The  U.S.  Science  and  Technology  Committee  held  three  public 
hearings to receive testimony from expert witnesses on climate en-
gineering. The official record of these hearings, including discussion 
transcripts,  witness  testimony,  questions  for  the  record,  and  other 
supplementary  materials,  was  finalized  in  July  2010  and  will  be 
available to academia, policy makers and the public.9 

Geoengineering:  Assessing  the  Implications  of  Large-Scale  Climate 

Intervention 

On  November  5,  2009,  with  the  Honorable  Bart  Gordon  (D–TN) 
presiding, the U.S. Committee held a hearing to introduce the con-
cept of climate engineering and explore some of the scientific, regu-
latory,  engineering,  governance,  and  ethical  challenges.  Five  wit-
nesses testified before the Committee:

• Professor  John  Shepherd,  Professional  Research  Fellow  in 
Earth System Science at the University of Southampton and 
Chair  of  the  Royal  Society  working  group  that  produced  the 
report  Geoengineering  the  Climate:  Science,  Governance  and 
Uncertainty
• Dr.  Ken  Caldeira,  Professor  of  Environmental  Science,  De-
partment  of  Global  Ecology  at  the  Carnegie  Institution  of 
Washington and co-author of the Royal Society Report
• Mr. Lee Lane, Co-Director of the American Enterprise Insti-
• Dr.  Alan  Robock,  professor  at  the  Department  of  Environ-
mental Sciences in the School of Environmental and Biologi-
cal Sciences at Rutgers University

tute Geoengineering Project

8 U.S.  GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE,  A  COORDINATED STRATEGY COULD FOCUS FED-
ERAL GEOENGINEERING RESEARCH AND INFORM GOVERNANCE EFFORTS (Publication No. GAO 10–
903) (2010).

9 Access  to  official  hearing  records  is  available  at  <http://www.gpo.gov/congress/house/

house14ch111.html>.

4

• Dr.  James  Fleming,  Professor  and  Director  of  the  Science, 
Technology and Society Department at Colby College and au-
thor of Fixing the Sky: The Checkered History of Weather and 
Climate Control.

Chairman  Gordon  introduced  some  key  challenges  with  climate 
engineering  and  described  Committee  plans  for  future  discussion 
and  international  collaboration.  He  warned  that  climate  engineer-
ing  is  no  substitute  for  greenhouse  gas  mitigation  and  would  re-
quire years of research before deployment. 

During  the  witness  testimony,  Professor  Shepherd  described  the 
goals and conclusions of the Royal Society report and recommended 
a  multidisciplinary  research  initiative  on  climate  engineering,  in-
cluding  widespread  public  engagement  at  a  global  scale.  Dr. 
Caldeira  profiled  the  two  major  categories  of  climate  engineering, 
solar  radiation  management  (SRM)  and  carbon  dioxide  removal 
(CRM),  and  called  for  an  interagency  research  program  on  both 
types.  Mr.  Lane  argued  for  the  economic  viability  of  and  environ-
mental  and  political  rationale  for  stratospheric  injections,  an  SRM 
strategy.  Dr.  Robock  identified  some  major  risks  and  uncertainties 
of climate engineering. Specifically, he noted the problems of inter-
national  disagreement,  large-scale  field  testing,  and  the  potential 
impacts of interruptions to large scale SRM systems, but argued for 
a  comprehensive  research  program  to  help  inform  future  climate 
policy  decisions.  Dr.  Fleming  provided  a  historical  context  on 
weather  modification  and  its  concurrent  governmental  challenges, 
arguing  that  any  climate  engineering  initiative  must  be  inter-
disciplinary, international, and intergenerational. 

During  the  question  and  answer  period,  the  Members  and  wit-
nesses  discussed:  the  eruption  of  Mt.  Pinatubo  in  1991  as  an  ana-
log  to  stratospheric  injections,  the  potential  efficacy  of  greenhouse 
gas  mitigation  goals,  the  need  for  continued  mitigation  strategies 
and behavioral changes, the methane output of livestock, the envi-
ronmental impacts of stratospheric injections, and the challenges of 
international  collaboration  and  regulation.  They  also  reviewed:  cli-
mate modeling and simulation tools, anthropogenic climate change, 
the  possibilities  of  distributed  solar  panels,  potential  roles  for  U.S. 
federal agencies in research and deployment, and how to prioritize 
the  different  suggested  strategies.  The  panelists  and  Members 
agreed  that  no  nation,  including  the  United  States  or  the  United 
Kingdom,  should  deploy  any  climate  engineering  strategies  before 
performing extensive research and establishing appropriate govern-
ance mechanisms. They also agreed that a comprehensive research 
program  should  be  multi-disciplinary  and  internationally  coordi-
nated.

Geoengineering II: The Scientific Basis and Engineering Challenges 
On  February  4,  2010,  with  the  Honorable  Brian  Baird  (D–WA) 
presiding,  the  Subcommittee  on  Energy  and  Environment  held  a 
hearing to explore the scientific foundation of several climate engi-
neering  proposals  and  their  potential  engineering  demands,  envi-
ronmental impacts, costs, efficacy, and permanence. Four witnesses 
testified before the Subcommittee:

5

Environment at the University of Calgary

• Dr.  David  Keith,  Canada  Research  Chair  in  Energy  and  the 
• Dr.  Philip  Rasch,  Laboratory  Fellow  of  the  Atmospheric 
Sciences  &  Global  Change  Division  and  Chief  Scientist  for 
Climate Science at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
• Dr.  Klaus  Lackner,  Ewing-Worzel  Professor  of  Geophysics 
and  Chair  of  the  Earth  &  Environmental  Engineering  De-
partment at Columbia University
• Dr. Robert Jackson, Nicholas Chair of Global Environmental 
Change  and  a  Professor  in  the  Biology  Department  at  Duke 
University.

During the witness testimony, Dr. Keith emphasized the distinc-
tion  between  the  two  types  of  climate  engineering,  and  compared 
climate  engineering  to  chemotherapy  as  an  unwanted  but  poten-
tially  necessary  tool  in  the  case  of  an  emergency  situation.  Dr. 
Rasch described SRM strategies and suggested first steps for devel-
oping  an  SRM  research  program,  noting  that  initial  costs  could  be 
low  but  that  more  sensitive  climate  modeling  tools  would  be  need-
ed. Dr. Lackner described the CDR strategies of carbon air capture 
and  mineral  sequestration.  He  noted  that  such  technologies  were 
compatible  with  a  continued  global  dependence  on  fossil  fuels  and 
would  address  the  causes,  rather  than  symptoms,  of  climate 
change,  but  that  high  costs  would  be  a  challenge.  Dr.  Jackson  dis-
cussed  biological  and  land-based  strategies  in  both  the  CDR  and 
SRM  categories.  He  explained  that  existing  regulatory  structures 
and  expertise  could  accommodate  many  of  these  strategies  fairly 
readily, but that both scalability and the foreseeable and unforesee-
able  impacts  on  other  natural  resources,  such  as  water  and  bio-
diversity, would be problematic. 

During  the  question  and  answer  period,  the  Members  and  wit-
nesses  discussed:  the  front  end  costs  of  climate  engineering  com-
pared  to  traditional  mitigation  alone,  the  costs  and  potential  im-
pacts  of  atmospheric  sulfate  injections,  and  creative  strategies  for 
chemical  and  geological  carbon  uptake.  They  also  explored  public 
education  and  opinion  on  climate  engineering,  the  potential  effects 
of increased structural albedo, and the greatest political challenges 
of  climate  management.  The  Members  emphasized  some  existing 
tools  that  could  reduce  the  need  for  climate  engineering,  such  as 
unconventional  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  (CCS)  strategies, 
the  availability  and  economic  viability  of  fossil  fuel  alternatives, 
and  energy  conservation.  All  the  witnesses  agreed  that  a  basic  re-
search program on the subject is likely needed, whether for the ul-
timate goal of deployment or for the sake of risk management.

Geoengineering  III:  Domestic  and  International  Research  Govern-

ance 

On  March  18,  2010,  with  the  Honorable  Bart  Gordon  presiding, 
the  Committee  held  a  hearing  to  explore  the  domestic  and  inter-
national governance needs to initiate and guide a climate engineer-
ing research program. The hearing also examined which U.S. agen-
cies and institutions have the capacity or authorities to conduct cli-
mate engineering research. Five witnesses, divided into two panels, 
testified before the Committee. 

6

Testifying  via  satellite  on  the  first  panel  was  Member  of  Par-
liament Phil Willis, then Chair of the Science and Technology Com-
mittee  in  the  U.K.  House  of  Commons  and  Representative  of  Har-
rogate  and  Knaresborough.  Mr.  Willis  has  subsequently  been  ap-
pointed  Baron  Willis  of  Knaresborough,  Member  of  the  House  of 
Lords.  In  his  opening  statement,  Chairman  Gordon  welcomed 
Chairman Willis as his honored guest. He emphasized that the sci-
entific  evidence  of  anthropogenic  climate  change  is  overwhelming 
and that a more robust scientific and political understanding of cli-
mate engineering is needed. 

Chairman  Willis  testified  on  the  U.K.–U.S.  joint  climate  engi-
neering  inquiry  and  introduced  his  Committee’s  official  report  on 
the  subject,  The  Regulation  of  Geoengineering.10 He  delineated 
some  of  the  report’s  key  findings  and  recommendations,  including 
governing  principles,  and  stressed  that  while  climate  engineering 
would  be  an  extremely  complex  and  challenging  venture,  it  would 
be irresponsible not to initiate appropriate regulation and research. 
During  the  first  question  and  answer  period,  Chairman  Willis  and 
the  U.S.  Committee  Members  discussed  the  potential  value  of  a 
comprehensive international database on climate engineering infor-
mation  and  activities,  the  future  of  research  in  the  United  King-
dom, and additional opportunities for bilateral cooperation between 
the Committees. They also discussed the role of public opinion and 
the media, and how the U.K. inquiry process engaged both the pub-
lic and scientific experts. 

The second panel consisted of:

ronment at the Government Accountability Office (GAO)

• Dr.  Frank  Rusco,  Director  of  Natural  Resources  and  Envi-
• Dr. Scott Barrett, Lenfest Professor of Natural Resource Eco-
nomics at the School of International and Public Affairs and 
the Earth Institute at Columbia University
• Dr.  Jane  Long,  Associate  Director-at-Large  and  Fellow  for 
the Center for Global Strategic Research at Lawrence Liver-
more National Lab (LLNL)
• Dr. Granger Morgan, Professor and Head of the Department 
of  Engineering  and  Public  Policy  and  Lord  Chair  Professor 
in Engineering at Carnegie Mellon University.

During  Panel  II,  Dr.  Rusco  summarized  key  findings  of  the 
GAO’s  ongoing  inquiry  on  climate  engineering,  describing  some  of 
the existing relevant research activities in federal agencies, as well 
as  some  relevant  international  treaties.  He  also  provided  support 
for the near-term regulation of some climate engineering strategies. 
Dr.  Morgan  described  climate  engineering  research  at  Carnegie 
Mellon  University  and  argued  for  a  cautious,  risk-aware  research 
program  on  solar  radiation  management.  He  also  argued  that  the 
National  Science  Foundation  should  lead  initial  research  efforts, 
that transparency should be a priority, and that the potential envi-
ronmental impacts of specific research initiatives should inform the 
international  agreements  and  laws  intended  to  regulate  them.  Dr. 
Long discussed the key questions and principles for governance and 

10 SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, UNITED KINGDOM HOUSE OF COMMONS, THE REGU-

LATION OF GEOENGINEERING (Stationery Office Limited) (2010). 

7

risk management, and urged that the benefits of any program must 
very  clearly  outweigh  the  risks.  Dr.  Barrett  assessed  the  different 
scenarios  in  which  climate  engineering  might  be  needed,  warning 
that  there  would  necessarily  be  ‘‘winner  and  losers,’’  and  rec-
ommended seven key governance rules. 

During  the  discussion  period  with  this  panel,  the  Members  and 
witnesses  discussed  initial  regulatory  structures  and  debated  the 
appropriate  research  and  management  roles  for  the  U.S.  Depart-
ment of Energy (DOE), the National Science Foundation (NSF), the 
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  the 
National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), and other 
U.S.  federal  agencies.  They  also  discussed  national  security  and 
geopolitical impacts of climate change itself and the need for adapt-
ive management. All panelists and witnesses agreed that unilateral 
deployment  of  climate  engineering  could  be  very  dangerous  and 
should  be  avoided.  There  was  also  a  consensus  that  climate  engi-
neering  is  a  highly  interdisciplinary,  diverse  topic,  and  that  any 
federal  research  initiative  may  require  several  agency  and  univer-
sity partners.

RESEARCH NEEDS 

As stated, climate engineering research will be multi-disciplinary 
and require a coordinated effort to sufficiently inform testing or de-
ployment  of  any  of  the  proposed  strategies.11 While,  some  strate-
gies,  such  as  forest  management,  have  a  more  extensive  scientific 
foundation than others, an improved understanding of the potential 
efficacy and impacts of all proposals is needed.12 Below are several 
key areas of research that may be needed to better understand the 
physical  and  chemical  processes,  and  assess  the  technical  and  fi-
nancial  feasibility,  engineering  needs,  and  the  environmental,  eco-
logical  and  societal  implications  of  various  climate  engineering 
strategies. These areas of research are commonly recognized by cli-
mate engineering and earth sciences experts as fundamental to one 
or  more  of  the  main  proposed  strategies.  They  include  but  are  not 
limited to: 

• Greenhouse gas monitoring, accounting and verification
• Hydrologic cycle modeling
• Water and air quality modeling and monitoring
• Atmospheric dynamics and physics
• Ocean and lake dynamics and physics
• Atmospheric  chemical  composition 

(e.g.  carbon  dioxide, 
ozone,  moisture,  and  other  greenhouse  gases  such  as  meth-
ane)

• Ocean and terrestrial biology and ecosystems
• Invasive plant and animal species
• Risk assessment and risk management

11 For  a  detailed  discussion  of  each  geoengineering  strategy  and  its  scientific  basis,  see  JOHN 
SHEPHERD ET AL.,  GEOENGINEERING THE CLIMATE:  SCIENCE,  GOVERNANCE AND UNCERTAINTY 
(The U.K. Royal Society) (2009). 

12 See DIVISION ON EARTH AND LIFE SCIENCES, NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL, AMERICA’S CLI-
MATE CHOICES: ADVANCING THE SCIENCE OF CLIMATE CHANGE p.297 (National Academies Press) 
(2010).

8

gas emissions

• Chemical, electrical and mechanical engineering 13 
• Earth systems environmental sciences 14, including modeling 
• Weather systems, including monsoon cycles
• Forces impacting the ozone layer
• Impacts  of  forestry  and  agricultural  practices  on  greenhouse 
• Biochar
• Terrestrial carbon sequestration
• Phytoplankton
• Ocean acidification and chemistry
• Recyclable carbon adsorbents
• Geologic/seismic imaging
• Radiation measurement
• Cloud microphysics
• Geochemical dynamics and carbon mineralization
• Sea ice dynamics and thermodynamics
• Genomic science
• Energy generation and use

The  tools  required  to  support  these  research  needs  include  but 

are not limited to:

mental satellites

and ocean waters

ing

and ground-based and in situ instrumentation

• High performance computing systems for modeling
• Weather  and  climate  monitoring  tools,  including  satellites, 
• Land  use  change  monitoring  systems,  including  environ-
• Networks  of  distributed  water  sampling  tools  for  both  fresh 
• Geological  imaging  tools,  such  as  spectroscopic  remote  sens-
• Chemical laboratories to measure and understand the role of 
• Biological  and  ecological  observing  systems  and  laboratories
• Engineering  research  laboratories  with  the  ability  to  bench 
test, field test, and evaluate various climate engineering con-
cepts

chemistry in the earth system

U.S. RESEARCH CAPACITIES 

There  is  virtually  no  federal  funding  explicitly  dedicated  to  ‘‘cli-
mate  engineering’’  or  ‘‘geoengineering’’  research.  However,  as  dis-
cussed in their October report, GAO found that some federal agen-
cies  already  conduct  activities  that  address  many  of  the  research 
needs  identified  above,  albeit  without  ‘‘climate  engineering’’  as  an 
express  or  intended  goal.15 This  section,  in  contrast  with  the  GAO 

13 See Geoengineering: Assessing the Implications of Large-Scale Climate Intervention Hearing 
Before  the  House  of  Representatives  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  111th  Cong.  (2009) 
(John Shepherd Testimony).

14 Id.
15 See  for  e.g.  STAFF OF HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECH-
NOLOGY,  111TH CONG.,  REPORT ON GEOENGINEERING III:  DOMESTIC AND INTERNATIONAL RE-

9

report, explores some of the existing tools and competencies in fed-
eral agencies that could contribute to climate engineering research. 
It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  any  federal  climate  engi-
neering  research  program  should  leverage  existing  facili-
ties,  instruments,  skills,  and  partnerships  within  federal 
agencies.

National Science Foundation 

The  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  supports  basic  research 
and  education  across  all  fields  of  fundamental  science  and  engi-
neering.  Most  of  NSF’s  budget  is  dedicated  to  supporting  investi-
gator-initiated,  merit-reviewed,  and  competitively-selected  awards 
and  contracts  to  researchers  and  teams  primarily  from  U.S.  col-
leges  and  universities,  but  also,  including  non-profit  organizations 
and private sector firms. A smaller portion of NSF funding goes to 
support major research centers and cutting-edge tools and facilities. 
NSF  also  has  a  long  history  of  fostering  and  conducting  inter-
national  scientific  collaborations  on  both  small  and  large-scale  re-
search  projects.  Therefore,  of  the  federal  research  agencies, 
the National Science Foundation (NSF) may have the great-
est  capacity  to  engage  in  research  related  to  the  nascent 
field  of  climate  engineering,  and  it  is  the  opinion  of  the 
Chair that NSF should support merit-reviewed proposals for 
climate engineering research.

An  Example  of  an  NSF  Grant Researchers  at  Rutgers  University  have 
received a grant, through the NSF Geosciences (GEO) Directorate, to explore 
stratospheric  injections  and  sunshading.  The  team  has  conducted  climate 
model simulations of the various scenarios of artificially introduced particles 
in  the  stratosphere.  And  they  have  investigated  the  potential  impacts  of 
stratospheric  injections  on  precipitation,  as  well  as  the  ethical  implications 
of  some  climate  engineering  proposals.  As  of  November  2009  the  team  had 
produced five peer-reviewed journal articles on its research.

Research Directorates 

NSF is divided into the following seven Directorates that support 
science  and  engineering  research  and  education:  Biological 
Sciences;  Computer  and  Information  Science  and  Engineering; 
Education and Human Resources; Engineering; Geosciences; Math-
ematical  and  Physical  Sciences;  and  Social,  Behavioral  and  Eco-
nomic  Sciences.  Each  Directorate  is  subdivided  into  divisions.  All 
Directorates,  with  the  likely  exception  of  Education  and  Human 
Resources,  support  research  needs  associated  with  climate  engi-
neering.  For  example,  the  Engineering  Directorate  currently  sup-
ports fundamental research on the development of materials, meth-
ods,  and  innovative  processes  for  the  separation  and  removal  of 
contaminants such as carbon dioxide from the air. The Geosciences 
(GEO)  Directorate  supports  research  on  the  chemistry  of  ocean 
acidification,  including  the  interplay  of  acidification  and  the  bio-
chemical and physiological processes of organisms, and the implica-
tions of these effects for ecosystem structure and function. In addi-

SEARCH GOVERNANCE BEFORE THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND 
TECHNOLOGY HEARING (Comm.  Print  2010)  (Frank  Rusco  Responses  to  Questions  for  the 
Record).

10

tion, the Biological Sciences (BIO) Directorate supports research on 
the  complexity  and  adaptability  of  biological  systems  and  their 
interface with the carbon and water cycles. Research activities that 
could contribute to ocean fertilization or terrestrial CDR strategies, 
for  example,  are  already  being  addressed  under  the  BIO  and  GEO 
portfolios.  It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  the  National 
Science  Foundation  (NSF)  should  consider  how  all  of  its 
grant  programs  could  contribute  to  a  climate  engineering 
research agenda.

Centers and Facilities 

While NSF does not operate its own laboratories, it supports con-
struction  and  operations  for  an  array  of  advanced  instrumentation 
and major research facilities, including oceanographic research ves-
sels.  For  example,  through  its  Major  Research  Equipment  and  Fa-
cilities  Construction  account,  NSF  is  currently  supporting  develop-
ment and construction of the National Ecological Observatory Net-
work  (NEON,  see  inset)  and  the  Oceans  Observatory  Initiative. 
NSF is also the primary sponsor for the National Center for Atmos-
pheric Research (NCAR). NCAR supports research in areas such as 
atmospheric  chemistry,  climate  change,  cloud  physics,  solar  radi-
ation, and related physical, biological, and social systems. NCAR is 
home to a number of world-class experts and tools, including an at-
mosphere-ocean  general  circulation  model,  which  could  contribute 
to climate engineering research. In fact, NCAR researchers have al-
ready  begun  to  explore  how  sulfate  particles  behave  in  the  strato-
sphere and their effects on the ozone layer.

National  Ecological  Observatory  Network The  NSF-funded  National 
Ecological  Observatory  Network  (NEON)  ecological  observation  program  is 
the  most  ambitious  U.S.  attempt  to  assess  environmental  change  to  date. 
The  program  has  divided  the  United  States  into  20  eco-climatic  domains 
and will monitor the regions over 30 years through site-based and geological 
data  and  airplane  observations.  The  results  will  inform  how  land  use 
change, climate change, and invasive species affect ecosystems.
NEON’s activities will include soil analysis, measuring land use and vegeta-
tion  changes,  and  monitoring  forest  canopy  heights  and  biomass.  Its  data 
will  enable  researchers  to  quantify  forces  regulating  the  biosphere  and  pre-
dict  its  response  to  change.  NEON  infrastructure  will  include  towers  and 
sensor  arrays,  remote  sensing,  cutting-edge  instrumentation,  and  facilities 
for data analysis, modeling, and forecasting. The level of detail and uninter-
rupted data sets expected from NEON and the experts that analyze its data 
could 
land-based  climate  engineering,  such  as 
afforestation  and  reforestation,  reflective  crops,  and  biochar.  NEON  could 
also contribute to the eventual monitoring of other CDR strategies.

inform  research  on 

Political and Ethical Research 

Understanding  the  full  range  of  impacts  of  climate  engineering 
will  entail  a  unique  set  of  challenges  outside  of  the  scientific  and 
engineering categories identified earlier. Research underlying areas 
such as domestic and international governance, economics, and risk 
assessment and management, will likely be required as long as cli-
mate engineering remains an option. There are also significant eth-
ical  considerations  with  the  large-scale  testing  and  deployment  of 
climate engineering, since some strategies may benefit certain pop-
ulations  at  the  expense  of  others.  Likewise,  there  are  ethical  con-

11

siderations in choosing to not deploy a strategy, should it prove via-
ble. 

NSF, with its capacity to support research in the social and polit-
ical  sciences,  may  be  an  appropriate  body  to  lead  federal  research 
in  these  areas.  The  Social,  Behavioral,  and  Economic  Sciences 
(SBE)  Directorate,  for  example,  has  funded  research  proposals  on 
the  societal  implications  of  environmental  events,  such  as  earth-
quakes.  The  Directorate’s  Sociology  Program  recently  funded  a 
workshop  to  explore  the  sociological  dimensions  of  climate  change 
and  climate  change  solutions,  including  how  the  social  sciences 
might  be  incorporated  into  existing  data  infrastructure.16 At  this 
time  NSF  is  the  only  federal  body  with  such  formalized  capacities 
for  research  on  the  social  and  political  dimensions  of  science  and 
emerging technologies. 

As with any government initiative in the development of nascent 
technologies  that  provoke  some  measure  of  controversy,  trans-
parency,  and  public  engagement  will  be  critical  to  a  successful  re-
search  program  on  climate  engineering.  Moreover,  public  engage-
ment will be most effective if it is incorporated early, when strate-
gies  are  still  being  considered  and  a  diversity  of  perspectives  can 
be  incorporated.17 The  Chair  agrees  with  the  U.K.  Committee 
recommendation  that  governments  should  make  public  en-
gagement  a  priority  of  any  climate  engineering  effort.  Fur-
thermore,  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF),  with  its 
institutional history of engaging the public on nascent tech-
nologies  and  funding  research  in  the  social  and  behavioral 
sciences,  should  play  a  critical  role  in  informing  public  en-
gagement strategies.

International Collaboration 

In addition to supporting basic research and early-stage develop-
ment  of  nascent  and  transformative  technologies,  NSF  has  unique 
capacities  for  fostering  international  scientific  collaboration.  The 
Office  of  International  Science  and  Engineering  (OISE)  supports 
some of its own internationally focused research and education pro-
grams  and  facilitates  collaboration  between  NSF-funded  research-
ers  and  international  partners  across  the  Foundation.  However, 
NSF  grant  programs  may  fund  only  the  U.S.  portion  of  research 
projects  being  conducted  by  international  teams  of  scientists  and 
engineers. For example, the Division of Earth Sciences has recently 
granted  funds  to  researchers  at  the  University  of  Maryland  to  ex-
plore  carbon  monoxide  oxidation  and  production,  and  these  efforts 
will  be  complemented  by  activities  funded  separately  at  the  Rus-
sian  Kamchatka  Institute  of  Volcanology  and  Seismology  and  the 
Russian  National  Academy  of  Sciences.18 The  Dimensions  on  Bio-

16 JOANE NAGEL ET AL.,  WORKSHOP ON SOCIOLOGICAL PERSPECTIVES ON GLOBAL CLIMATE 
CHANGE (National  Science  Foundation)  (2009).  Available  at  <http://ireswb.cc.ku.edu/∼crgc/
NSFWorkshop/Readings/NSF¥WkspReport¥09.pdf>. 

17 Daniel Sarewitz, Not By Experts Alone, 466 NATURE p.688 (2010).
18 For  example,  Dr.  Frank  Robb  at  the  University  of  Maryland  Biotechnology  Institute  re-
ceived  a  National  Science  Foundation  Collaborative  Research  grant,  number  0747394,  entitled 
‘‘Carbon Monoxide Dynamics in Geothermal Mats and Earth’s Early Atmosphere.’’ For more in-
formation  see  the  National  Science  Foundation’s  website  at  <http://www.nsf.gov/awards/
award¥visualization¥noscript.jsp?org=EAR&showAwardDollars=true&showPerCapita=true 
&region=US-MD&instId=5300000455>. 

12

diversity  initiative  will  fund  a  set  of  coordinated  proposals  re-
searching  the  role  of  biodiversity  in  ecological  and  evolutionary 
processes.  The  solicitation  for  this  initiative  encourages  investiga-
tors  to  develop  international  collaborations,  either  through  direct 
research partnerships or the development of international coordina-
tion  networks.19 NSF’s  support  of  U.S.  participation  in  inter-
national scientific and engineering efforts may prove critical to any 
significant international climate engineering research effort, in par-
ticular  for  those  strategies  with  geographically  dispersed  impacts, 
such as stratospheric injections, marine cloud whitening, and ocean 
fertilization. 

Challenges in Europe There are lessons to be learned from the European 
experience  with  the  still-nascent  field  of  synthetic  biology.  The  potential  ap-
plications  of  synthetic  biology,  including  its  capacity  to  modify  the  genetic 
makeup of food crops to increase crop yields and provide greater pest resist-
ance  have  been  met  with  uncertainty.  Public  confusion  about  governmental 
motivations for agricultural biotechnology led to a virtual moratorium on ge-
netically  modified  (GM)  foods.  Having  learned  from  these  challenges,  both 
German  and  British  national  research  councils  have  recently  committed  to 
a thorough public dialogue regarding synthetic biology as they seek to jump 
start development in the field.a A number of unresolved questions on the eth-
ical  and  environmental  implications  of  synthetic  biology  remain,  and  inter-
national standards are minimal or nonexistent. Better public engagement in 
Europe is seen as a fundamental step in the development of this field.

a Colin  Macilwain,  Talking  the  Talk:  Without  Effective  Public  Engagement,  There  Will  Be  No 

Synthetic Biology in Europe, 465 NATURE p.867 (2010).

National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration 

The  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA), 
through  its  research  laboratories  and  partners,  and  the  Climate 
Program  Office,  conducts  broad  ranging  research  into  complex  cli-
mate  systems  with  the  aim  of  improving  our  ability  to  understand 
these  systems  and  predicting  climate  variation  and  change  over  a 
range  of  temporal  and  spatial  scales.  NOAA’s  research  capacities 
and  monitoring  and  modeling  tools  make  it  an  appropriate  venue 
for  climate  engineering  research—to  understand  how  such  activi-
ties  could  be  conducted  and  what  effects,  both  desired  and  un-
known, may occur as a result.

Office of Oceanic and Atmospheric Research 

The  Office  of  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research  (OAR)  is 
NOAA’s  primary  research  body,  providing  the  research  foundation 
for  understanding  the  complex  systems  that  support  the  planet. 
The  role  of  OAR  is  to  provide  unbiased  science  to  better  manage 
the  environment,  on  a  national,  regional,  and  global  scale.  To  do 
this,  OAR  administers  collaborative  partnerships  with  universities 
and other research bodies and works with its own research labora-
tories  to  advance  climate  science.  As  the  primary  research  and  de-
velopment organization within NOAA, OAR explores the earth and 
atmosphere  from  the  surface  of  the  sun  to  the  depths  of  the  ocean 

19 See National Science Foundation, Program Solicitation: Dimensions of Biodiversity (Mar. 10, 
2010).  Available  at  <http://nsf.gov/publications/pub¥summ.jsp?WT.z¥pims¥id=503446&ods 
¥key=nsf10548>.

13

to  provide  products  and  services  that  describe  and  predict  changes 
in the environment and inform effective decision making. 

Current research priorities at OAR could be leveraged to support 
future  climate  engineering  research  initiatives.  For  example,  the 
Climate Program Office manages and awards funding through com-
petitive  research  programs  on  high-priority  topics  in  climate 
science,  including  atmosphere,  Arctic  ice,  the  global  carbon  cycle, 
climate variability, and oceanic conditions. Several types of climate 
engineering  research  needs  could  fit  into  these  existing,  broad  re-
search categories. In addition, the Climate Observations and Moni-
toring program maintains a highly integrated and complex network 
of  observing  instruments  to  gather  climate  data,  which  are  then 
used  for  national  and  international  assessment  projects.  Such  a 
network would be pertinent to informing the scope of potential eco-
system impacts from climate engineering. 

Another  pertinent  mission  at  OAR  is  Weather  and  Air  Quality. 
This mission focuses on forecasting and hazard warnings as well as 
on  the  chemical  and  physical  makeup  of  the  atmosphere,  circula-
tion  patterns,  and  changes  caused  by  chemical  inputs.  Although 
many of OAR’s ocean and freshwater activities relate to traditional 
NOAA  missions,  such  as  fisheries  management  and  coastline  res-
toration,  OAR  also  conducts  a  great  measure  of  research  on  issues 
relevant  to  climate  engineering  research  such  as  aquatic  invasive 
species, freshwater contamination, the nutrient pollution cycle, and 
ocean acidification. 

OAR’s  laboratories  support  these  research  missions  and  conduct 
cutting-edge technology development and analysis. Specifically, the 
Geophysical Fluid Dynamic Laboratory (GFDL) and Earth Systems 
Research  Laboratory  (ESRL)  support  a  host  of  key  activities  rel-
evant to climate engineering. OAR research is also informed by an 
array  of  cutting-edge  field  observation  tools  and  sensors,  including 
surface networks, stratospheric balloons, ocean buoys, and aircraft, 
that  would  be  uniquely  suited  to  atmosphere-based  climate  engi-
neering  research  and  monitoring.  Each  program  office  uses  power-
ful  computing  systems  to  assess  and  predict  changes  in  the  eco-
systems. Any number of OAR’s ongoing research activities could di-
rectly  and  immediately  inform  climate  engineering.  For  example, 
the Arctic Research Office could explore the potential of geographi-
cally-localized SRM to protect polar ice. In addition, OAR expertise 
on biological emission and absorption of greenhouse gases and car-
bon  storage  in  oceans  could  be  leveraged  to  predict  the  impacts  of 
any potential CDR strategy.

Research at the Earth Systems Research Laboratory Scientists at the 
Earth Systems Research Laboratory (ESRL) have begun to explore the poten-
tial  impacts  of  SRM  on  solar  power  production.  In  March  2009  the  Chem-
ical  Sciences  Division  published  a  paper  on  how  atmospheric  sulfate  injec-
tions may significantly decrease power generation from solar facilities.b The 
paper  suggests  that  for  every  percentage  of  direct  sunlight  reflected  to  outer 
space,  solar  power  output  would  decrease  by  four  or  five  percent.  In  addi-
tion,  there  is  the  even  more  troubling  concern  that  atmospheric  SRM  could 
negatively  impact  food  crops  growth  and  decrease  yields.  Any  atmospheric

14

SRM research program must be subject to robust risk assessment and man-
agement  procedures,  including  modeling  exercises  on  the  secondary  impacts 
that  a  reduction  in  direct  sunlight  could  have  on  both  solar  power  installa-
tions and plant growth.

b Daniel  M.  Murphy,  Effect  of  Stratospheric  Aerosols  on  Direct  Sunlight  and  Implications  for 

Concentrating Solar Power, 43 ENVIRONMENTAL SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY p.2784 (2009).

National Environmental Satellite Data and Information Service 

The  National  Environmental  Satellite,  Data,  and  Information 
Service (NESDIS) is NOAA’s satellite observation systems and data 
collection  service.  NESDIS  transmits  real  time  data  from  both  or-
biting and geo-stationary satellites for a host of research objectives 
such as weather forecasting and earth and ocean science, and man-
ages the development of environmental satellite products. Like the 
environmental  satellite  capabilities  within  NASA,  the  NESDIS  ob-
serving system can collect data on a wide variety of environmental 
factors  including  the  motion  of  particles  in  the  atmosphere,  cloud, 
air and ocean temperatures, ocean dynamics, global vegetation, at-
mospheric  humidity,  and  land  cover.  NESDIS  also  holds  thorough 
data records on Arctic sea ice, which is measured via satellites and 
verified with ‘‘ground-truthing’’ equipment and software. Long term 
measurements on Arctic sea ice would be needed to verify the effec-
tiveness  of  any  climate  engineering  program,  as  well  as  the  inad-
vertent and indirect effects of such programs. 

The information collected by NESDIS is processed, analyzed, and 
disseminated through NOAA’s data centers. One of these data cen-
ters,  the  National  Climatic  Data  Center  (NCDC),  provides  for  the 
long-term archiving of weather and climate data and is the world’s 
largest  active  archive  of  these  types  of  information.  NESDIS  also 
oversees  six  Regional  Climate  Centers  (RCCs),  a  network  of  data 
management  sites  providing  climate  information  at  the  state  and 
local  levels,  as  well  as  nine  Regional  Integrated  Sciences  and  As-
sessments  (RISA)  offices,  which  deliver  climate  information  to  re-
gional and local decision-makers. The National Oceanographic Data 
Center  (NODC)  maintains  physical,  biological,  and  chemical  meas-
urements  from  oceanographic  observations,  satellite  remote  sens-
ing,  and  ocean  modeling.  The  National  Geophysical  Data  Center 
(NGDC) manages the National Snow and Ice Data Center, and also 
holds over 400 digital and analog databases on geophysical ground- 
and  satellite-based  measurements,  including  geochemical  makeup 
and  carbonate  data.  Data  holdings  from  all  NESDIS  Centers  are 
currently  used  to  answer  questions  about  climate  change  and  nat-
ural  resources,  and  would  be  useful  to  inform  the  early  stages  of 
climate  engineering  research.  The  Centers  may  also  serve  as  re-
positories for any new data gathered in the course of climate engi-
neering research. 

The  NOAA  satellite  systems  provide  a  range  of  data  sets  on  at-
mospheric,  oceanic,  and  geologic  conditions,  and  new  systems  with 
improved  instrumentation  are  planned  for  deployment.  For  exam-
ple, the Geostationary Operation Environmental Satellite R–Series 
(GOES–R),  is  a  joint  NOAA–NASA  satellite  project  based  out  of 
Goddard Space Flight Center. The two satellites in this system are 
expected to launch in 2015 and 2017, and will provide data on sea 
surface temperature, cloud top height and temperature, and aerosol 

15

detection,  among  other  baseline  products.  These  tools  could  inform 
research on stratospheric aerosol injection, marine cloud whitening, 
ocean fertilization, and other climate engineering strategies. 

Lessons  can  also  be  learned  from  another  NOAA–NASA  joint 
project,  the  Joint  Polar  Satellite  System  (JPSS),20 formerly  known 
as  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operation  Environmental  Satellite 
System  (NPOESS).  The  program  was  initiated  in  1994  and  was 
slated to launch six environmental monitoring satellites starting in 
2009. However, due to management challenges, explosive growth in 
life-cycle  cost  estimates,  and  schedule  delays  the  program  will  in-
stead launch two separate satellite systems managed by NOAA and 
DOD,  respectively,  with  NASA  serving  as  NOAA’s  technical  sup-
port  arm.  The  first  JPSS  satellite  is  scheduled  to  launch  in  2014. 
While JPSS promises to deliver robust capabilities for weather and 
climate  forecasting,  due  to  the  aforementioned  issues,  the  system’s 
capabilities  will  be  significantly  reduced.  For  instance,  the  aerosol 
polarimetry  sensors,  which  retrieve  specific  measurements  on 
clouds  and  aerosols  in  the  atmosphere,  were  cancelled  from  two  of 
the  satellites,  thus  cancelling  two  of  the  key  information  products, 
aerosol  refractive  index  and  cloud  particle  size  and  distribution, 
which  could  have  provided  the  types  of  data  that  atmospheric-
based  climate  engineering  research  requires.  The  NPOESS/JPSS 
project  also  demonstrates  how  easily  large  and  complex  research 
projects can fall victim to financial and management challenges, as 
well  as  the  importance  of  mission  consistency  and  data  continuity 
in the success of any comprehensive research program. 

Environmental Impact Research: The Oceans 

Ocean  fertilization  is  the  intentional  introduction  of  nutrients, 
such  as  iron,  into  the  surface  waters  of  the  ocean  to  stimulate  the 
growth  of  phytoplankton  and  thereby  the  uptake  of  carbon  dioxide 
from  the  atmosphere.  Phytoplankton  are  photosynthetic;  they  use 
energy from the sun to naturally convert carbon dioxide and water 
into organic compounds and oxygen. Iron is necessary for photosyn-
thesis  to  occur  and  in  many  areas  of  the  ocean  iron  is  not  abun-
dant,  thereby  limiting  the  growth  of  phytoplankton.  The  idea  be-
hind  ocean  fertilization  projects  is  to  use  relatively  small  amounts 
of  iron  in  iron-deficient  zones  to  trigger  large  phytoplankton 
blooms. At least half of the carbon-rich biomass generated by such 
plankton  blooms  would  be  consumed  by  animals  such  as 
zooplankton  and  small  fish,  and  about  a  third  would  sink  into  the 
cold,  deep  ocean  water  where  it  would  be  effectively  isolated  from 
the atmosphere for centuries. Fertilization does occur through nat-
ural  processes  such  as  glacial  runoff,  dust  storms,  and  through 
ocean  upwelling  that  carries  cold,  nutrient  rich  water  to  the  sur-
face.  Since  the  early  1990s,  a  number  of  scientists  and  entre-
preneurs  from  around  the  world  have  explored  ocean  fertilization 

20 The  U.S.  Science  and  Technology  Committee  held  seven  hearings  on  challenges  facing  the 
NPOESS program over the last seven years before the Investigations and Oversight and Energy 
and  Environment  Subcommittees.  See  for  e.g.  Continuing  Independent  Assessment  of  the  Na-
tional  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System  Hearing  Before  the  House  of 
Representatives  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  Subcommittee  on  Energy  and  Environ-
ment,  111th  Cong. 
(2009).  Available  at  <http://science.house.gov/publications/hear-
ings¥markups.aspx>.

16

as  a  means  to  sequester  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  in  the  deep 
ocean.21 

Several concerns have been voiced from the scientific community 
over  the  efficacy  and  ethics  of  ocean  fertilization.  For  example, 
some  phytoplankton  blooms  (e.g.,  harmful  algal  blooms  or  HABs) 
produce  toxins  that  are  extremely  detrimental  to  human  health 
and  coastal  economies.  HABs  impacts  in  the  Great  Lakes,  Gulf  of 
Mexico,  and  the  Pacific  Northwest  have  been  particularly  severe 
and  have  led  to  the  creation  of  ‘‘dead  zones.’’ 22 The  increase  of 
HABs is a concern from ocean fertilization projects because it is not 
known  what  types  of  plankton  will  ‘‘bloom’’  after  fertilization.  Re-
search is ongoing to understand how to control, mitigate, and effec-
tively  respond  to  HABs  events.  That  said,  much  research  remains 
to  be  done  in  this  arena,  and  the  potential  to  exacerbate  HABs  is 
only  one  of  the  ecological  hazards  that  could  be  caused  by  large-
scale  iron  fertilization.  In  addition  to  this  and  other  potential  eco-
logical effects, the efficiency of fertilization as well as the ability to 
verify  the  resulting  sequestration  of  carbon  dioxide  are  issues  that 
have  yet  to  be  resolved.23 Therefore,  it  is  the  opinion  of  the 
Chair  that  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Adminis-
tration  (NOAA),  with  its  unique  expertise  and  research  ca-
pacities  on  ocean  chemistry,  should  have  a  lead  role  in  re-
searching  and  assessing  the  environmental  impacts  of  any 
climate engineering strategy involving chemical inputs into 
the  environment  that  would  directly  or  indirectly  impact 
ocean waters, e.g. stratospheric sulfate injections and ocean 
fertilization.

Environmental Impact Research: The Ozone Layer 

Some  researchers  have  expressed  concern  that  aerosols  from 
stratospheric  sulfate  injections  will  exacerbate  the  effects  of  mate-
rials  remaining  in  the  atmosphere  from  the  past  usage  of 
chlorofluorocarbons  (CFCs).24 CFCs  were  once  sold  in  popular  con-
sumer  products  such  as  aerosol  spray  cans  and  refrigerants,  but 
were  found  to  decay  the  atmospheric  ozone  layer  that  moderates 
the  amount  of  ultraviolet  light  reaching  the  earth’s  surface.  In  re-
sponse to these risks, the United States initiated bans on CFCs be-
ginning  in  1978,  and  these  substances  were  essentially  phased  out 
of commerce worldwide via the Montreal Protocol. Since these bans 
have  taken  effect,  the  ozone  layer  has  shown  a  marked  recovery, 
but the atmospheric system will remain sensitive to damage in the 
future  from  CFCs  or  other  hazardous  compounds  that  have  yet  to 
be identified. In addition, human activities that stimulate ozone-de-

21 P.W. Boyd et al., Mesoscale Iron Enrichment Experiments 1993–2005: Synthesis and Future 

Directions, 315 SCIENCE p.612 (2007). 

22 Harmful  Algal  Blooms:  Formulating  an  Action  Plan,  2009:  Hearing  on  The  Harmful  Algal 
Blooms  and  Hypoxia  Research  and  Control  Act  Hearing  Before  House  of  Representatives  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology Subcommittee on Energy and Environment, 111th Cong. (2009) 
(Hearing Charter). 

23 Anand  Gnanadesikan  et  al.,  Effects  of  Patchy  Ocean  Fertilization  on  Atmospheric  Carbon 

Dioxide and Biological Production, 17 GLOBAL BIOGEOCHEMICAL CYCLES p.1050 (2003).

24 David Keith, Geoengineering the Climate: History and Prospect, 25 ANNUAL REVIEW OF EN-

ERGY AND THE ENVIRONMENT p.245 (2000). 

17

structive  materials  could  slow  or  even  reverse  the  recovery  proc-
ess.25 

NOAA  scientists  were  among  the  first  to  identify  the  risks  pre-
sented by ozone-depleting chemicals, and OAR remains the federal 
government’s  primary  authority  on  the  ozone  layer.  NOAA  uses 
satellite  and  ground-based  measurements  to  continually  monitor 
stratospheric  ozone  as  well  as  other  conditions,  such  as  the  pres-
ence  of  certain  chemicals  which  can  detrimentally  impact  the  at-
mosphere.  NOAA’s  Earth  Systems  Research  Laboratory  (ESRL), 
the  Climate  Prediction  Center,  and  the  National  Climatic  Data 
Center (NCDC) are all engaged in improving data holdings and in-
formation  on  ozone.  It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  due  to 
its  experience  in  researching  ozone  and  the  chemicals  that 
could  harm  the  ozone  layer,  the  National  Oceanic  and  At-
mospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  should  lead  federal  ef-
forts  to  explore  the  potential  impacts  of  sulfates  on  the 
stratospheric ozone layer.

Department of Energy 

Several  program  offices  within  the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE) 
house activities and expertise that could inform research on climate 
engineering strategies.

Office of Science 

The  bulk  of  climate  change  research  expertise  at  DOE  may  be 
found  within  the  Office  of  Science,  which  is  responsible  for  about 
40% of the overall federal R&D investment in the physical sciences. 
Of  the  six  program  offices  within  the  Office  of  Science,  at  least 
three  contain  climate  engineering-relevant  research  capabilities: 
Biological  and  Environmental  Research  (BER),  Basic  Energy 
Sciences  (BES),  and  Advanced  Scientific  Computing  Research 
(ASCR).

Biological and Environmental Research Program 

The Biological and Environmental Research (BER) program office 
supports interdisciplinary research and user facilities to explore bi-
ological  sciences,  bioenergy,  climate  change,  carbon  sequestration, 
subsurface contamination, hydrology, and the interface between bi-
ological  and  physical  sciences,  among  other  topics.  While  the  pro-
gram is most widely known for its work in human genome sequenc-
ing, and many BER activities are not directly related to climate en-
gineering,  a  major  relevant  focus  of  BER  is  its  work  in  genomics 
and biosequestration. BER studies the fundamental biological proc-
esses found in microbes and plants, and specifically how these proc-
esses  influence  the  highly  complex  and  interlinked  global  carbon 
cycle.  As  part  of  that  charge,  BER  explores  the  potential  of  bio-
sequestration,  or  the  storage  of  organic  carbon  in  ecosystems,  and 
how  it  might  contribute  to  future  climate  change  adaptation  and 
mitigation  strategies.  Additionally,  BER  genomics  activities  are  at 
the  frontier  of  biotechnology  research,  using  innovative  tech-

25 Simone  Tilmes  et  al.,  The  Sensitivity  of  Polar  Ozone  Depletion  to  Proposed  Geoengineering 

Schemes, 320 SCIENCE EXPRESS p.1201 (2008). 

18

nologies  to  influence  the  uptake,  fixation,  and  storage  of  carbon  in 
microbes  and  plants.  In  this  regard,  BER’s  capabilities  could  help 
inform  land-based  climate  engineering  strategies  for  large-scale 
planting  of  indigenous  or  non-indigenous  plants  to  encourage  bio-
logical  carbon  consumption.  Additionally,  some  strategies  call  for 
the  genetic  altering  or  cross-breeding  of  plants  or  trees  to  enhance 
their  capacities  to  reflect  sunlight,  to  accelerate  carbon  uptake,  or 
both. 

In addition, BER’s Climate and Environmental Sciences Division 
(CESD) supports basic research in a broad variety of relevant sub-
ject  areas,  including  atmospheric  systems,  high  performance  com-
puter modeling, the role of terrestrial ecosystems in carbon cycling, 
subsurface  biogeochemical  processes,  and  other  multi-scale  proc-
esses  and  anthropogenic  and  natural  activities  that  affect  the  cli-
mate.  This  division  of  BER  supports  the  Carbon  Dioxide  Informa-
tion  Analysis  Center  (CDIAC)  located  at  Oak  Ridge  National  Lab-
oratory.  CDIAC  is  the  primary  climate-change  data  and  informa-
tion  analysis  center  of  DOE,  and  is  considered  to  be  one  of  the 
world’s  most  comprehensive  archives  and  managers  of  diverse  cli-
mate  data  sets.  CDIAC  gathers  and  consolidates  environmental 
data  from  a  wide  variety  of  sources,  maintains  and  regularly  up-
dates  that  data,  and  makes  the  data  available  for  free  to  a  large 
international  user  database.  A  major  source  of  data  for  CDIAC  is 
the  AmeriFlux  observation  network.  Established 
in  1996, 
AmeriFlux  tracks  the  carbon,  water,  and  energy  cycles  in  North 
America 
from  approximately  100  sites  distributed  primarily 
throughout  North  America,  with  some  sites  in  Central  and  South 
America.  Ameriflux  could  contribute  to  carbon  accounting  and 
verification programs needed to monitor the effectiveness of carbon 
dioxide  removal  (CDR)  climate  engineering  strategies.  Ameriflux 
also  coordinates  with  the  global  ‘‘network  of  regional  networks,’’ 
FLUXNET,  to  share  and  validate  data  measurements  worldwide. 
The  networks  comprising  FLUXNET  utilize  complementary  meth-
odologies  and  instrumentation,  and  perform  cross-comparisons  of 
data  sets  to  verify  their  results.  The  internationally-coordinated 
mission  and 
the  collaborative,  communicative  structure  of 
AmeriFlux  and  FLUXNET  could  provide  a  model  for  what  would 
be  required  to  identify  the  global  impacts  and  effectiveness  of  any 
climate  engineering  strategy,  in  particular  carbon  removal  strate-
gies. 

BER  also  manages  several  user  facilities  that  could  support  cli-
mate  engineering  research.  The  Atmospheric  Radiation  Measure-
ment (ARM) Climate Research Facility (ACRF) conducts aerial and 
land-based  sampling  over  different  climate  regions  to  measure 
changes in sea surface temperatures, cloud life cycle, and other ra-
diative  properties  of  the  atmosphere.  The  ACRF  collects  and  ar-
chives  data,  and  makes  it  available  to  the  scientific  community. 
This  information  is  used  to  illuminate  how  particles  in  the  atmos-
phere  affect  the  earth’s  radiation  balance,  information  that  would 
be critical to any atmospheric-based climate engineering strategies. 
And like Ameriflux, ACRF can also contribute to carbon accounting 
and  verification  programs  that  would  be  needed  to  understand  the 
effectiveness  of  any  carbon  dioxide  removal  (CDR)  program.  BER 
also  funds  the  Environmental  Molecular  Sciences  Laboratory 

19

(EMSL)  at  Pacific  Northwest  National  Lab.  EMSL  supports  re-
search in biogeochemistry and atmospheric chemistry at the molec-
ular  level,  including  research  in  areas  such  as  aerosol  formation, 
with  capabilities  that  include  supercomputing  for  modeling  molec-
ular-level  processes  and  advanced  terrestrial  imaging.  The  sci-
entific  and  technical  experts  and  unique  tools  at  EMSL  could  in-
form  climate  engineering  research  in  areas  such  as  geological  and 
biological sequestration and stratospheric injections.

Aerosol  Research A  working  group  within  the  Atmospheric  Radiation 
Measurement  program  has  recently  published  a  paper  on  predicting  which 
types of atmospheric particles will act as cloud condensation nuclei, or CCN. 
CNN  are  the  tiny  airborne  ‘‘seeds’’  around  which  water  vapor  will  condense 
and  form  droplets.  Different  types  of  CCN  influence  a  cloud’s  particular 
brightness and lifetime. A better understanding of CCN is critical to inform-
ing marine cloud whitening, because specific types of CCN would be needed 
to most effectively increase a cloud’s size and reflectivity.c

c S.M.  King  et  al.,  Cloud  Droplet  Activation  of  Mixed  Organic-Sulfate  Particles  Produced  by 

the Photooxidation of Isoprene, 10 ATMOSPHERIC CHEMISTRY AND PHYSICS p.3593 (2010).

Basic Energy Sciences Program 

The Basic Energy Sciences (BES) program office supports funda-
mental  research  on  materials  sciences,  physics,  chemistry,  and  en-
gineering, with an emphasis on energy applications. Its work is di-
vided  into  three  divisions:  Materials  Sciences  and  Engineering; 
Chemical  Sciences,  Geosciences  and  Biosciences;  and  Scientific 
User  Facilities.  BER’s  work  in  geosciences  and  chemical  research 
may be particularly pertinent to climate engineering research. The 
Geosciences  Research  program  promotes  understanding  of  earth 
processes and materials, such as the basic properties of rocks, min-
erals,  and  fluids,  and  it  supports  computational  modeling  and  im-
aging  of  geophysical  landscapes  over  a  wide  range  of  spatial  and 
time  scales.  These  activities  are  often  conducted  at  DOE  national 
labs  and  in  concert  with  NSF  or  the  USGS.  Thus,  Geosciences  Re-
search  at  BER  may  inform  the  fundamental  chemical  and  techno-
logical requirements, as well as the long-term viability of potential 
sites,  for  non-traditional  carbon  sequestration,  in  which  captured 
carbon  would  be  stored  and  mineralized  into  a  solid  or  liquid  form 
in  specific  types  of  geologic  systems,  such  as  basalt  sands.  The 
Chemical  Research  program  could  support  unconventional  carbon 
capture  and  sequestration  (CCS)  by  informing  the  chemical  proc-
esses  through  which  carbon  dioxide  or  other  greenhouse  gases  can 
be  mineralized  for  storage,  as  well  as  the  characterization  and  de-
velopment of chemicals, such as amines, to capture carbon from the 
air. 

BES  also  manages  the  Energy  Frontier  Research  Centers,  a  set 
of  temporary,  highly  focused,  transformative  energy  research  col-
laborations. The EFRC program is structured to fund the country’s 
best talent in research to address fundamental scientific barriers to 
energy  security  and  key  energy  challenges.  Forty-six  EFRCs  are 
currently being funded over a five year period, and several of these 

20

are intended to address geologic capture and storage of CO2.26 The 
new  information  from  these  EFRCs  can  contribute  greatly  to  the 
body of information on unconventional CCS. 

Advanced Scientific Computing Research Program 

The  Office  of  Science’s  Advanced  Scientific  Computing  Research 
(ASCR)  program  stewards  several  of  the  largest  computational  fa-
cilities in the world dedicated to unclassified scientific research. Its 
broad and varied capabilities include producing high-fidelity, highly 
complex  simulations  of  the  earth’s  systems  and  the  potential 
changes  they  might  undergo.  This  allows  scientists,  from  both  the 
private  and  public  sectors,  to  analyze  theories  and  experiments  on 
weather  patterns,  the  water  cycle,  changes  in  atmospheric  carbon, 
and others that are too dangerous, expensive, or simply impossible 
to test otherwise. The Scientific Discovery through Advanced Com-
puting  (SciDAC)  Program  within  ASCR  integrates  with  other  re-
search efforts at DOE to explore application-focused research initia-
tives,  including  climate  activities.  For  example,  SciDAC  has  pro-
vided  detailed  climate  simulations  to  the  Biological  and  Environ-
mental  Research  (BER)  program.  One  SciDAC  project  will  develop 
and test a global cloud resolving model (GCRM) that divides global 
atmospheric  circulation  into  grid  cells  approximately  3  km  in 
size.27 The  level  of  complexity  and  number  of  variables  in  the  at-
mospheric  system  can  only  be  modeled  at  such  a  refined  spatial 
resolution through highly powerful computing systems. 

Given  the  wide  variety  of  climate  engineering’s  potential  unin-
tended impacts on earth systems, exhaustive efforts must be made 
to  identify  and  avoid  the  most  dangerous  of  those  before  a  climate 
engineering  program  is  tested  or  deployed  at  any  scale.  The  com-
plex modeling capacities through ASCR could provide valuable pre-
dictions  as  to  the  potential  impacts  of  climate  engineering  without 
the risks of large scale field testing. Therefore, it is the opinion 
of the Chair that the expertise and the high-end computing 
facilities  overseen  by  the  Advanced  Scientific  Computing 
Research  (ASCR)  program,  or  other  comparable  high-per-
formance  computing  tools,  should  be  used  to  model  the  im-
pacts  of  climate  engineering  before  field  testing  is  per-
formed.

Other Research Activities at DOE

Office of Energy Efficiency and Renewable Energy 

The  Office  of  Energy  Efficiency  and  Renewable  Energy  (EERE) 
is  responsible  for  working  with  industry  and  other  stakeholders  to 
advance a diverse supply of energy efficient and clean energy tech-
nologies and practices, through research in areas such as wind and 
solar  energy  generation  and  advanced  vehicle  technologies.  In  con-
trast  to  the  basic  research  activities  in  the  Office  of  Science’s  BER 

26 For  example,  the  objective  of  the  Energy  Frontier  Research  Center  located  at  Lawrence 
Berkeley National Laboratory is to establish the scientific foundations for the geological storage 
of  carbon  dioxide.  For  more  information  see  the  Energy  Frontier  Research  Center  website 
<http://www.er.doe.gov/bes/EFRC/CENTERS/NCGC/efrc¥NCGC.html>.

27 DAVID A. RANDALL, ON A CLOUDY DAY—THE ROLE OF CLOUDS IN GLOBAL CLIMATE (Colorado 

State University) (2007). Available at <http://www.scidac.gov/climate/climate.html>. 

21

program, the Biomass Program within EERE represents the appli-
cation side of DOE’s biomass efforts, consolidating research on bio-
mass  feedstocks  and  conversion  technologies,  biofuels,  bioproducts, 
and biopower. The Program works closely with BER and in coordi-
nation  with  the  USDA  to  translate  basic  scientific  information  to 
deployable  and  commercializeable  technologies.  In  this  way,  the 
Biomass Program could inform land and biological-based strategies 
by  drawing  on  its  collective  expertise  on  biochar  and  biomass-re-
lated  carbon  sinks  and  releases  from  land  use  changes.  For  exam-
ple,  the  Biomass  Program  examines  how  biomass  is  converted  to 
both biochar (solid) and bio-oil (liquid) by heating it in the absence 
of  air,  a  conversion  technology  process  called  pyrolysis.  Biochar 
may  have  potential  as  an  efficient  method  of  atmospheric  carbon 
removal,  via  plant  growth,  for  storage  in  soil.  Biochar  is  a  stable 
charcoal-solid  that  is  rich  in  carbon  content,  and  thus  can  poten-
tially be used to lock significant amounts of carbon in the soil. The 
bio-oil can be converted to a biofuel after an additional, costly con-
version  process.  The  Biomass  Program  focuses  on  how  to  reduce 
costs  of  the  conversion  process  and  how  to  manipulate  product  ra-
tios  for  more  or  less  bio-oil  and  biochar.  Additionally,  the  Biomass 
Program has funded joint research with the EPA and USDA to de-
velop quantitative models of international land use changes associ-
ated  with  increased  biofuel  production,  including  life-cycle  anal-
yses.  These  types  of  activities  would  help  in  determining  the  life-
cycle carbon impacts of large scale biomass production.

Office of Fossil Energy 

The Office of Fossil (FE) seeks to develop technologies to enhance 
the  clean  use  of  domestic  fossil  fuels,  reduce  emissions  from  fossil-
fueled  power  plants,  and  maintain  secure  and  reasonably  priced 
fossil energy supplies. FE’s mission is supported by research activi-
ties  at  the  National  Energy  Technology  Lab  (NETL),  which  has 
sites in five U.S. cities. 

Through  the  Office  of  Fossil  Energy  and  in  part,  the  National 
Labs,  DOE  has  spent  a  number  of  years  on  near-  and  long-term 
strategies  to  accelerate  research,  development,  and  demonstration 
of carbon capture from fossil-fueled power plants and geologic stor-
age  in  deep  saline  aquifers,  depleted  oil  and  gas  fields,  and  sedi-
mentary  formations.  Its  activities  have  included  the  Clean  Coal 
power  Initiative,  FutureGen,  the  Innovations  for  Existing  Plants 
Program,  the  Advanced  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle 
(IGCC)  Program,  and  the  Carbon  Sequestration  Regional  Partner-
ships. DOE has also represented the United States in international 
research consortia on CCS such as the Carbon Sequestration Lead-
ership Forum (CSLF). The CSLF is comprised of 24 member coun-
tries and the European Commission, and is organized by DOE. The 
purpose of the CSLF is, through international cooperation, to facili-
tate  CCS  technology  development,  and  to  overcome  technical,  eco-
nomic, environmental, regulatory, and financial obstacles. 

The  climate  engineering  strategy  of  air  capture,  by  comparison, 
captures carbon dioxide directly from ambient air rather than from 
a  point  source  like  the  flue  gas  stream  of  a  coal-fired  power  plant. 
The captured gases could be stored in ‘‘alternative’’ geologic forma-
tions such as basalt sands, in formations under the oceans, or con-

22

verted  to  different  products  altogether.  The  existing  skill  sets  and 
resources at DOE could readily translate to research on air capture 
and  unconventional  sequestration.  In  fact,  NETL  has  already 
awarded grant funding to explore the options for carbon storage in 
alternative  materials  for  ‘‘beneficial  reuse,’’  such  as  a  concrete, 
rather  than  storage  in  the  more  commonly  suggested  depleted  oil 
fields and sedimentary geologic formations.28 Therefore, it is the 
opinion  of  the  Chair  that  the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE) 
should  lead  any  federal  research  program  into  air  capture 
and non-traditional carbon sequestration.

‘‘Because of the similarities with CCS, it makes some sense to augment cur-
rent research by DOE’s Fossil Energy program in CCS to include separation 
technology related to air capture of CO2. There are technical synergies in the 
chemical  engineering  of  these  processes  and  the  researchers  are  in  some 
cases  the  same.  The  research  is  complementary.  The  governance  issues  re-
lated to geologic storage are exactly the same.’’

—Dr.  Jane  Long,  Geoengineering  III:  Domestic  and  International  Re-

search Governance (hearing testimony) (2010).

National Aeronautics and Space Administration 

The  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA) 
houses  robust  airborne  and  satellite-based  environmental  moni-
toring  capacities  and  facilities  devoted  to  studying  geologic  and  at-
mospheric  conditions.  In  addition,  NASA  employs  to  high-perform-
ance  modeling  tools  that  could  support  climate  engineering  re-
search.

Earth Science Division 

NASA’s Earth Science Division, under its Science Mission Direc-
torate,  is  responsible  for  advancing  understanding  of  the  earth’s 
systems  and  demonstrating  new  technologies  and  capabilities 
through research and development of environmental satellites. The 
Earth  Science  Division  measures  climate  variability  through  var-
ious  satellite  and  airborne  missions  and  performs  basic  research 
and  advanced  modeling  of  earth’s  systems.29 The  tools  and  exper-
tise  located  within  the  Earth  Science  Division  could  inform  any 
number  of  climate  engineering  applications  through  modeling,  ob-
serving, and analyzing land use and atmospheric change to attempt 
to  predict,  and  ultimately  monitor,  the  impacts  of  large  scale  test-
ing and deployment of such climate engineering applications. 

Satellites 

The  Earth  Science  Division  operates  a  set  of  coordinated  sat-
ellites  that  could  contribute  to  climate  engineering  research  in  a 
number  of  ways.  These  satellites  record  perturbations  in  a  variety 
of earth systems, including the land surface, biosphere, sea ice, at-
mosphere,  and  oceans.  These  measurements  help  construct  a  de-

28 Winning  projects  were  announced  on  July  22,  2010  and  will  receive  funding  via  the  Amer-
ican  Reinvestment  and  Recovery  Act  (ARRA).  See  <http://fossil.energy.gov/recovery/projects/
beneficial¥reuse.html>.

29 See  NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION,  RESPONDING TO THE CHALLENGE 
OF CLIMATE OF ENVIRONMENTAL CHANGE: NASA’S PLAN FOR A CLIMATE-CENTRIC ARCHITECTURE 
FOR EARTH OBSERVATIONS AND APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE (2010).  Available  at  <http://
science.nasa.gov/earth-science/>.

23

tailed picture of global change, especially when augmented by land- 
and ocean-based data from other sources. In addition, some of these 
missions  involve  international  partnerships,  which,  in  the  case  of 
deployment  of  climate  engineering  applications,  would  likely  be 
necessary  to  ensure  global  coverage  in  monitoring.  Two  currently 
operating  satellites  systems  and  one  being  planned  for  launch  are 
profiled  as  examples  below.  A  host  of  other  NASA  observing  data 
and  instruments  may  be  useful  for  informing  climate  engineering 
strategies.  Ultimately,  the  chosen  climate  engineering  strategy 
would  determine  the  specific  requirements  of  the  space-based  sys-
tem intended to monitor its effects.

Stratospheric Aerosol and Gas Experiment 

First launched in 1979, the Stratospheric Aerosol and Gas Exper-
iment  (SAGE)  series,  which  measures  changes  in  the  ozone  layer 
and  the  presence  of  aerosols  in  the  atmosphere.  SAGE  I  measured 
sunlight  absorption  from  1979–1981.  Launched  in  1984,  SAGE  II 
provided information about the ozone layer and atmospheric water 
vapor  for  over  twenty-one  years.  SAGE  III  was  launched  in  2001 
and provided information on ozone and the presence of water vapor 
and  aerosols  in  the  atmosphere.  It  was  terminated  in  2006  due  to 
loss  of  communication  with  the  satellite.  At  the  first  Committee 
hearing, Dr. Alan Robock noted in his testimony:

While  the  current  climate  observing  system  can  do  a  fairly 
good  job  of  measuring  temperature,  precipitation,  and  other 
weather  elements,  we  currently  have  no  system  to  measure 
clouds of particles in the stratosphere. After the 1991 Pinatubo 
eruption, observations with the SAGE II instrument . . . showed 
how  the  aerosols  spread,  but  it  is  no  longer  operating.  To  be 
able  to  measure  the  vertical  distribution  of  the  aerosols,  a 
limb-scanning design, such as that of SAGE II, is optimal.

As  volcanic  eruptions  can  serve  as  a  natural  analog  for  strato-
spheric  injections,  careful  monitoring  of  major  eruptions  through 
satellites  could  greatly  inform  certain  SRM  strategies.30 Marine 
cloud  whitening  and  stratospheric  injections  strategies  would  also 
require  robust  information  on  atmospheric  particles  and  aerosol 
movement  and  distribution.  Many  experts  have  argued  that  the 
U.S.  research  and  monitoring  infrastructure  on  the  behavior  of  at-
mospheric particles would require significant improvement to suffi-
ciently  inform  climate  engineering.  For  these  reasons  instruments 
for  measuring  atmospheric  aerosols  would  be  critical  to  a  climate 
engineering  research  program,  in  particular  for  the  atmosphere-
based strategies.31 

30 Committee  witness,  Dr.  Granger  Morgan,  equated  volcanic  eruptions  to  ‘‘natural  SRM  ex-
periments.’’  See  Geoengineering  III:  Domestic  and  International  Research  Governance  Hearing 
Before  the  House  of  Representatives  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  111th  Cong.  (2010) 
(Granger Morgan Written Testimony). 

31 NASA has begun plans to refurbish SAGE III with the President’s Fiscal Year 2011 budget 
request.  Its  launch  date  goal  is  as  early  as  late  2014.  See  NASA,  RESPONDING TO THE CHAL-
LENGE OF CLIMATE AND ENVIRONMENTAL CHANGE: NASA’S PLAN FOR A CLIMATE-CENTRIC ARCHI-
TECTURE FOR EARTH OBSERVATIONS AND APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE (2010). Available at <http:/
/science.nasa.gov/earth-science/>.

Landsat 

24

Landsat  is  a  series  of  seven  satellites  constructed  by  NASA  and 
operated  by  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  (USGS).  The  first  satellite 
was  launched  in  the  early  1970s  to  collect  spectral  information 
from  the  earth’s  surface.  The  program  has  since  produced  an  ar-
chive  of  over  thirty-seven  years  of  uninterrupted  data  on  land 
cover,  making  it  the  world’s  oldest  continuous  record  of  global  im-
agery.32 This  information,  taken  at  a  spatial  resolution  of  just  30 
m units, can be used in comparison with local and regional climate 
data to determine the impacts of specific land use changes on tem-
perature, precipitation, evapotranspiration, and reflectivity. In this 
manner  Landsat  could  be  used  for  researching  and  monitoring 
land-based 
such  as  aggressive 
afforestation  and  reforestation  and  reflective  crops.  In  fact,  Brazil 
already  leads  a  forest  carbon  tracking  program  largely  based  on 
Landsat  data.  However,  at  present  only  two  satellites,  Landsat-5 
and Landsat-7, launched in 1984 and 1999 respectively, continue to 
supply  imagery,  and  have  already  outlived  their  projected  life-
spans. In anticipation of service interruption, NASA and USGS are 
developing  a  follow-on  satellite  as  part  of  the  Landsat  Data  Con-
tinuity Mission (LDCM), and hope to launch it in late 2012.33 Suc-
cess of the LDCM is critical to maintaining data continuity of mod-
erate resolution remote sensing imagery. 

geoengineering 

strategies, 

The  Orbiting  Carbon  Observatory Several  experts  have  noted  the  role 
that  Orbiting  Carbon  Observatory  (OCO)  might  have  played  in  researching 
topics related to climate engineering. The project, initiated in NASA’s Earth 
System  Science  Pathfinder  Program,  was  intended  to  take  precise  space-
based measurements of the carbon concentrations in Earth’s atmosphere and 
improve understanding of the processes that regulate atmospheric CO2. How-
ever,  a  launch-related  failure  caused  the  OCO  to  crash  into  the  Pacific 
Ocean  upon  launch  in  February  2009.  This  data  could  have  informed  the 
effectiveness  of  any  CDR  strategy.  This  capability  could  be  realized  again  if 
NASA  successfully  launches  and  deploys  its  second  version  of  the  satellite 
by 2013, as planned.

MODIS 
Data 

by 

collected 

the  Moderate  Resolution 

Imaging 
Spectroradiometer  (MODIS)  instrument  is  an  example  of  how 
NASA  could  inform  ocean-based  climate  engineering  strategies. 
Launched in 1999 on board the Terra Satellite, and in 2002 on the 
Aqua  satellite,  MODIS  instruments  work  in-tandem  to  record 
changes  occurring  on  land,  in  the  oceans,  the  lower  atmosphere, 
and the water cycle. MODIS’ ocean color sensing capabilities could 
be  used  to  identify  the  growth  and  motion  of  carbon-consuming 
plankton, which is purported to be stimulated by the inputs of iron 
or  other  chemicals  into  ocean  waters.  MODIS  can  measure  carbon 
levels  on  land,  as  well,  by  recording  the  levels  of  photosynthesis 
conducted  by  plants.  MODIS  also  records  measurements  on  sea 
surface  height  and  temperature  that  could  monitor  the  effective-
ness  of  a  strategy  once  it  has  been  deployed.  It  records  data  on 
cloud type, the percentage of the earth’s surface that is covered by 

32 The data continuity of Landsat is required by law. 15 U.S.C. § 5601 et seq. 
33 CARL E.  BEHRENS,  LANDSAT AND THE DATA CONTINUITY MISSION p.4  (U.S.  Congressional 

Research Service) (2010).

25

clouds  on  a  given  day,  and  the  amounts  of  aerosols  present  in  the 
troposphere.  In  fact,  the  MODIS  instruments  on  both  Terra  and 
Aqua were key to distinguishing clouds from the ash plume created 
by  2010  eruption  of  the  Eyjafjallajo¨kull  volcano  in  Iceland.34 Each 
of  these  capacities  would  be  pertinent  to  one  or  more  strategies, 
most  notably  marine  cloud  whitening  and  stratospheric  injections. 
Landsats 5 and 7, Terra and Aqua are among the 13 monitoring 
satellites  NASA  has  in  operation,  and  an  additional  20  satellites, 
including  OCO–2,  are  being  planned  as  of  July  19,  2010.  NASA’s 
existing satellite-based information could not only help increase un-
derstanding  of  global  processes  and  feedback,  but  could  also  pro-
vide  the  long-term  data  sets  needed  to  identify  the  ‘‘fingerprints’’ 
of human activity, both unintentional and intentional. The Chair-
man  recommends  that  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space 
Administration’s  (NASA)  previously  collected  earth  systems 
data  and  its  future  observations  of  any  relevant  naturally 
occurring  environmental  event,  such  as  volcanic  eruptions, 
be  integrated  as  appropriate  into  any  comprehensive  fed-
eral climate engineering research program.

Basic Research and Modeling 

Complementing the satellite portfolio, NASA’s Earth Science Re-
search  program  supports  a  variety  of  climate  engineering-relevant 
research activities, including carbon cycling, global climate and en-
vironmental models, ozone trends, and biogeochemistry. The Earth 
Science  Division  also  supports  high-end  computing  capabilities,  in 
particular  through  the  Ames  Research  Center  and  Goddard  Space 
Flight  Center.  In  June  2010  the  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  in-
troduced  its  NASA  Center  for  Climate  Simulation  (NCCS),  which 
more than doubles the computing capacity at Goddard and will pro-
vide visualization and data interaction technologies for climate pre-
diction  and  modeling  elements  of  the  biosphere  such  as  ice  cover. 
The  Goddard  Institute  for  Space  Studies  (GISS)  is  the  research 
center  housing  NASA’s  primary  climate  modeling  and  research  ca-
pabilities,  including  general  circulation  models  (GCMs)  that  study 
the  potential  for  humans  to  impact  the  climate.  Computing  mod-
eling capacities at the Goddard Institute for Space Studies have al-
ready  been  used  to  carry  out  simulations  of  sulfate  aerosols  at  dif-
ferent  various  altitudes  and  latitudes  in  the  atmosphere  through 
climate  modeling  grants.35 Researchers  at  GISS  also  perform  data 
analysis  on  key  climate  information  that  could  eventually  inform 
the  effectiveness  of  climate  engineering  applications.  In  the  last 
year,  for  example,  GISS  has  launched  at  least  two  new  research 
campaigns  on  the  behavior  of  aerosols  in  the  atmosphere,36 which 
may help inform the scientific theory behind atmosphere-based cli-
mate engineering. Basic climate research, modeling, and computing 

34 Mitigating  the  Impact  of  Volcanic  Ash  Clouds  on  Aviation—What  Do  We  Need  to  Know? 
Hearing Before the House of Representatives Committee on Science and Technology Subcommittee 
on Space and Aeronautics, 111th Cong. (2010) (Jack Kaye Testimony). 

35 Philip  J.  Rasch  et  al.,  An  overview  of  Geoengineering  of  Climate  Using  Stratospheric 
Sulphate  Aerosols,  366  PHILOSOPHICAL TRANSACTIONS OF THE ROYAL SOCIETY A  p.4007  (2008). 
36 See for e.g. NASA’s Goddard Institute for Space Studies (GISS) research initiative on carbo-
naceous aerosols, which is contributing to the U.S. Department of Energy’s larger Carbonaceous 
Aerosol  and  Radiation  Effects  Study 
campaign.  Available  at  <http://
www.giss.nasa.gov/research/news/20100701/>.

(CARES) 

26

at NASA could contribute in a number of ways to a federal climate 
engineering research program. 

Adaptive Management and Complex Missions 

NASA scientists and engineers may also be uniquely suited to re-
search  some  climate  engineering  applications  due  to  an  institu-
tional capacity for complex, technical missions and highly adaptive 
design  capabilities.  Space-based  applications  at  NASA  are  original 
designs,  developed  to  fulfill  specific,  and  often  changing,  mission 
objectives. For this reason NASA has a unique capacity for risk as-
sessment,  managing  complex  operating  environments  and  accom-
modating significant unknowns. As Dr. Jane Long noted in her tes-
timony,  these  skills,  known  as  ‘‘adaptive  management,’’  would  be 
critical  to  modifying  a  complex,  non-linear  system,  such  as  the  cli-
mate, successfully.37 

Environmental Protection Agency 

As the federal body responsible for protecting human health and 
safeguarding the natural environment, including air quality, water 
quality, soils, and biodiversity, the Environmental Protection Agen-
cy (EPA) would be needed to regulate many of the proposed climate 
engineering  activities  if  tested  or  deployed.  The  Agency  also  con-
tains a broad set of research capacities that could contribute to the 
scientific foundation of climate engineering. The Office of Research 
and  Development  (ORD),  one  of  EPA’s  twelve  headquartered  of-
fices, serves as the Agency’s primary research arm to inform a vari-
ety of environmental topics, such as nanotechnology and global cli-
mate change, as well as risk assessment, risk management and re-
gion-specific  technical  support.  Contained  within  ORD  are  seven 
Research Fields:

• National Center for Environmental Assessment (NCEA)
• National Center for Environmental Research (NCER)
• National Center for Computational Toxicology (NCCT)
• National Homeland Security Research Center (NHSRT)
• National Risk Management Research Laboratory (NRMRL)
• National Exposure Research Laboratory (NERL)
• National  Health  and  Environmental  Effects  Research  Lab-

oratory (NHEERL)

The  information  gathered  and  synthesized  at  ORD  provides  the 
scientific foundation for the other EPA program offices, such as Of-
fice  of  Air  and  Radiation,  to  most  appropriately  regulate  activities 
that impact the environment. 

ORD’s  research  on  potential  climate  engineering  activities  could 
inform  EPA’s  position  on  which  strategies  have  unacceptable  envi-
ronmental risks, how specific strategies are likely to impact natural 
resources,  and  the  potential  consequences  to  human  health.  It  is 
the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  as  the  Environmental  Protec-
tion Agency’s (EPA) steward of basic research, the Office of 

37 Geoengineering  III:  Domestic  and  International  Research  Governance  Hearing  Before  the 
House  of  Representatives  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  111th  Cong.  (2010)  (Jane  Long 
Testimony).

27

Research  and  Development  (ORD)  should  be  a  partner  in 
any climate engineering research program.

National Center for Environmental Economics 

The National Center for Environmental Economics (NCEE) with-
in  EPA’s  Office  of  Policy,  Economics  and  Innovation  (OPEI)  is  re-
sponsible  for  developing  cost-benefit  analyses  of  environmental 
policies  and  their  secondary  impacts.  NCEE  releases  journal  arti-
cles,  Environmental  Economics  reports,  and  research  papers  to 
compare costs and assess risks in specific cases, such as the effects 
of  acidic  air  pollutants  on  crop  yields.  Such  analysis  could  be  used 
to compare climate engineering strategies and provide an economic 
baseline  to  help  determine  which  strategies  appear  economically 
undesirable  in  comparison  with  traditional  mitigation  strategies. 
Tools  such  as  those  within  NCEE  may  also  be  particularly  impor-
tant  with  regards  to  those  climate  engineering  strategies  where  fi-
nancial cost is not a significant consideration when compared to al-
ternatives.  Stratospheric  aerosols,  for  example,  are  expected  to  be 
deployable  at  a  relatively  low  direct  cost.  However,  their  indirect 
economic  impacts,  such  as  changes  to  natural  resources  and  the 
productivity  of  solar  power  arrays,  could  far  outweigh  the  imme-
diate  expense  of  deployment.  NCEE  could  analyze  and  report  on 
the  potential  secondary  costs  of  climate  engineering  in  order  to 
properly  incorporate  them  in  objective  economic  cost-benefit  anal-
yses.  NCEE  could  also  provide  useful  risk  assessment  information 
and  identify  avenues  to  link  climate  engineering  to  the  social 
sciences.

Early Regulatory Needs 

Outside of its potential contributions to the basic research needs 
associated  with  climate  engineering,  EPA  may  also  be  needed  to 
explore  the  regulatory  needs  and  options  as  the  science  develops. 
At this time the Agency is finalizing its rules on carbon sequestra-
tion  in  underground  geological  formations,  via  its  authority  under 
the  Safe  Drinking  Water  Act  (SDWA).  In  developing  these  regula-
tions  EPA  has  sought  to  use  the  best  science  in  order  to  perform 
risk assessments and identify and qualify the events that might en-
danger drinking water safety and human health, such as the poten-
tial for contaminant leakage. If climate engineering deployment be-
comes a more serious option, EPA should stay abreast of the evolv-
ing  science  and  be  prepared  with  the  most  appropriate  regulatory 
options.  Furthermore,  EPA  may  be  needed  to  regulate  research  in 
the  case  of  large-scale  field  tests.  One  common  concern  about  cli-
mate engineering research is that because the climate system is so 
complex  and  interconnected,  for  field  testing  to  be  useful,  it  would 
have  to  be  conducted  at  near-deployment  scale  to  fully  determine 
a  strategy’s  effectiveness  and  secondary  impacts.  While  overly-re-
strictive regulations that unnecessarily hinder our ability to inform 
the risks and opportunities of climate engineering should be avoid-
ed,  some  proposed  field  research  activities  could  have  meaningful 
impacts  on  our  ecosystems.  In  the  interest  of  protecting  human 
health and natural resources, EPA may be needed to apply existing 

28

regulations  or  develop  frameworks  for  new  regulations  should 
large-scale field testing commence.

U.S. Department of Agriculture 

The United States Department of Agriculture’s (USDA) ability to 
monitor  and  research  land  use  change,  agriculture  practices,  for-
estry,  and  biological  sequestration  could  be  informative  to  a  range 
of climate engineering strategies. The USDA is broken into several 
sub-agencies based on program missions, and of these, the Agricul-
tural Research Service houses a number of relevant tools and skill 
sets, along with the U.S. Forest Service and the Economic Research 
Service.

Agricultural Research Service 

The  Agricultural  Research  Service  (ARS)  is  the  USDA’s  primary 
research arm and is responsible for, among other activities, explor-
ing  the  interaction  of  agriculture  and  the  environment.  Its  activi-
ties are organized into National Programs (NPs) that focus on spe-
cific  topics,  and  several  of  the  active  NPs  have  clear  relationships 
to  climate  engineering,  such  as  Soil  Resource  Management,  Air 
Quality;  Global  Change;  Integrated  Agricultural  Systems;  and  Cli-
mate Change, Soils and Emissions. 

The Bioenergy NP, for example, is the USDA initiative primarily 
responsible  for  research  on  the  production  and  use  of  biochar  and 
bioenergy. As described earlier in the section on Department of En-
ergy  activities,  biochar,  a  charcoal  produced  from  carbon-rich  or-
ganic materials, could be developed and deployed as a biological cli-
mate  engineering  strategy.  Biochar  may  be  used  for  several  pur-
poses:  to  produce  energy,  to  produce  soil  fertilizers,  and  simply  to 
biologically  sequester  carbon  from  the  atmosphere.  USDA,  along 
with DOE, has been responsible for the bulk of research on biochar 
feedstocks  and  land  issues  at  the  federal  level,  and  could  use  its 
expertise  to  inform  scientific  research  and  biomass  related  strate-
gies.  It  is  to  be  noted  that  while  the  USDA  and  DOE  have  done 
significant  research  on  biochar,  it  has  been  in  pursuit  of  beneficial 
soil  amendments  and/or  bio-oil,  which  can  be  used  for  fuel,  with  a 
lesser  focus  on  carbon  sequestration  goals.  The  USDA  has  not  ex-
amined  in  detail  the  singular  goal  of  using  biochar  to  achieve  cli-
mate  engineering-scale  changes  in  atmospheric  carbon  levels.  Bio-
logical  or  land-based  strategies  would  likely  be  needed  over  vast 
parcels of land, perhaps millions of acres,38 in order to be effective. 
Biochar  deployment  activities  at  this  scale  would  entail  consider-
able  economic  challenges.  The  USDA’s  Economic  Research  Service, 
described  below,  has  the  skill  set  to  inform  the  economic  viability 
of biochar at a climate engineering scale. 

The potential contributions of ARS extend beyond understanding 
the  impacts  of  land-based  climate  engineering  strategies.  Atmos-
phere-based  strategies  for  increasing  global  albedo  would  purport-
edly  control  temperature  increases  that  could  be  harmful  to  agri-
culture  and  forest  growth,  at  least  for  some  period  of  time.  How-

38 Geoengineering  II:  The  Scientific  Basis  and  Engineering  Challenges  Hearing  Before  the 
House  of  Representatives  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  Subcommittee  on  Energy  and 
Environment, 111th Cong. (2010) (Robert Jackson Testimony). 

29

ever,  reflecting  1–2%  of  incoming  solar  radiation,  as  most  SRM 
strategies recommend, may also be detrimental to plant growth. All 
plants  require  sunlight  for  photosynthesis  to  grow  and  reproduce, 
so a decrease in direct sunlight could negatively impact crop yields. 
In  addition,  it  remains  unclear  how  chemical  inputs  to  the  atmos-
phere  could  affect  plant  growth  and  soils.  Atmospheric  modeling 
suggests  that  particles  injected  into  the  stratosphere,  such  as  sul-
fates and salts, would eventually fall into the troposphere and ‘‘rain 
out’’  onto  land  and  water  surfaces  below.  In  sufficient  quantities, 
these  materials  could  have  negative  impacts  on  both  existing 
plants  and  soil  content.  Both  to  protect  the  livelihood  of  farmers 
and to protect the health of food sources and ecosystems in general, 
ARS  could  help  predict  and  quantify  the  extent  of  these  negative 
impacts  on  land  and  water  and  provide  a  valuable  contribution  to 
the overall risk analysis of climate engineering.

U.S. Forest Service 

The  U.S.  Forest  Service,  which  manages  the  155  U.S.  national 
forests and 20 U.S. national grasslands, since 1905 has maintained 
its  own  Research  and  Development  organization.  The  R&D  branch 
collaborates closely with the ARS, and its more than 500 research-
ers study, among other topics: forest and grassland health, sustain-
able  forest  management,  invasive  species,  aquatic  ecosystems,  tree 
growth  and  mortality,  and  forest  inventories.  The  institutional 
knowledge and management skills within the R&D branch could be 
used to inform aggressive afforestation and reforestation strategies, 
both  by  issuing  projections  on  how  effective  a  strategy  might  be 
and also for identifying key risks associated with climate engineer-
ing-scale forest management. For example, its Invasive Species Re-
search Program develops tools to predict and prevent the introduc-
tion  of  invasive  species.  Modification  to  plant  growth  at  a  large-
scale,  in  particular  via  monoculture  cropping,  can  make  an  area 
particularly susceptible to damage from non-native and invasive in-
sects  or  plants.  A  research  program  on  man-made  forests  for  car-
bon  storage  or  reflective  grasses  intended  to  increase  local  albedo, 
might benefit from such expertise. 

Forest  Service  R&D  also  performs  a  wide  variety  of  research  ac-
tivities  on  the  sequestration  capacity  of  soils,  vegetation,  and  for-
ests. Additional research is conducted to inform our understanding 
of how soil capacity will change over time with the climate. Higher 
atmospheric  carbon  levels  and  changes  in  the  earth’s  water  cycles 
caused by climate change may make the sequestration potential of 
plant  growth  better  or  worse,  and  at  a  very  large  scale,  these  po-
tential  fluctuations  could  significantly  alter  the  impacts  of  carbon-
sensitive  land  management.  Furthermore,  resource  specialists  in 
the Forest Service work with the Economic Research Service to ex-
plore  land  use  competition  and  prioritize  uses  for  economical  and 
environmental activities. Such analysis could be important because 
of  the  economic  pressure  these  activities  will  put  on  natural  re-
sources. 

In  addition,  the  U.S.  Forest  Service  recently  established  a  Na-
tional  Roadmap  for  Responding  to  Climate  Change  to  guide  forest 
managers in implementing the USDA climate change strategy. The 
program details the potential of forests and soils to mitigate atmos-

30

pheric  greenhouse  gas  concentration  through  biological  storage. 
This  information  could  ultimately  inform  forest  management  as 
part of a larger climate engineering program. In addition, while the 
Roadmap is intended for climate change mitigation and adaptation, 
and  does  not  address  climate  engineering  specifically,  it  proposes 
frameworks  for  a  communication  network  with  regional  managers 
regarding  short-  and  long-term  goals  and  best  practices,  plans  for 
public  education  and  outreach,  and  thorough  coordination  with 
other  agencies  and  groups.  The  plan’s  emphasis  on  adaptation 
needs  and  a  communications  strategy  is  somewhat  unique  to  cur-
rent federal climate change efforts. These elements would augment 
any large-scale climate engineering effort, and, as such, the Forest 
Service  Roadmap  may  be  a  valuable  model  for  coordinating  activi-
ties to educate land managers on climate engineering-scale forestry 
and biological sequestration.

Economic Research Service 

The  USDA’s  Economic  Research  Service  (ERS)  informs  public 
and  private  decision-making  on  economic  issues  related  to  agri-
culture  and  natural  resources.  This  resource  could  be  adapted  to 
assess  the  economic  viability  of  biological  climate  engineering  ac-
tivities.  Any  strategy  would  alter  and  create  competition  for  nat-
ural resources.

‘‘Biological  and  land-based  geoengineering  alters  carbon  uptake,  sunlight 
absorption,  and  other  biophysical  factors  that  affect  climate  together. 
Geoengineering for carbon or climate will alter the abundance of water, bio-
diversity, and other things we value.’’

—Dr.  Robert  Jackson,  Geoengineering  II:  The  Scientific  Basis  and  Engi-

neering Challenges (written hearing testimony) (2010).

For  example,  large-scale  afforestation  could  require  a  significant 
input of water, so benefits such as air quality and decreases in at-
mospheric carbon concentrations would be balanced against greater 
competition for local water resources that could be needed for other 
uses.  Similarly,  since  certain  strategies  could  be  particularly  land-
intensive,  climate  engineering  could  cause  added  competition  for 
land  use.  The  ERS,  which  employs  both  economists  and  social  sci-
entists  to  conduct  its  research,  may  be  needed  to  explore  potential 
trade-offs  and  inform  how  a  land-based  strategy  could  be  economi-
cally  viable.  The  ERS  also  conducts  research  on  financial  instru-
ments,  such  as  tax  credits,  that  might  encourage  private  land-
owners  to  undertake  specific  climate  engineering  strategies,  such 
as distributed carbon management activities.39 

Other Federal Agencies 

A number of other federal agencies have capacities that could in-

form climate engineering research. 

The  Department  of  Defense  (DoD)  has  significant  expertise 
and  experience  in  relevant  areas  such  as  large-scale  engineering 
projects  and  airborne  missions.  Several  experts  recommend  that 

39 See  for  e.g.  JAN LEWANDROWSKI ET AL.,  ECONOMICS OF SEQUESTERING CARBON IN THE U.S. 
AGRICULTURAL SECTOR (U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture—Economic  Research  Service)  (2004). 
Available at <http://ssrn.com/abstract=552724>.

31

this  knowledge-base  could  complement  climate  engineering-specific 
programs. However, it should be noted that given the lack of trans-
parency of defense research and programs, leveraging the capabili-
ties of DoD could result in an adverse impact on the goal of public 
engagement  and  education  on  the  issue  of  climate  engineering.  It 
is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  if  the  Department  of  De-
fense’s (DoD) expertise were to be engaged in a national cli-
mate  engineering  research  strategy,  special  attention  must 
be  paid  to  public  engagement  and  transparency,  and  all  re-
search  efforts  must  be  committed  solely  to  peaceful  pur-
poses.

The U.S. Geological Survey (USGS), within the Department of 
the  Interior,  would  also  have  a  role  in  research  on  land-  and  bio-
based  climate  engineering  strategies.  The  diverse  USGS  team, 
which  includes  geoscientists,  biologists,  chemists,  geographers,  hy-
drologists,  statisticians,  and  ecologists,  supports  a  breadth  of  sci-
entific  research,  monitoring,  and  analysis.  For  example,  the  USGS 
conducts programs to detect, monitor, and control invasive species, 
catalogue land use and the impacts of land use change, and exam-
ine  the  biological,  chemical,  and  environmental  factors  affecting 
water quality. In addition to its contributions to joint research and 
satellite  monitoring  programs  such  as  Landsat,  USGS  has  unique 
remote  sensing  capabilities  that  provide  data  on  natural  resources 
and  how  they  are  affected  by  change.  These  data  sets,  such  as 
those managed through the USGS’ National Satellite Land Remote 
Sensing  Data  Archive,  can  work  in  concert  with  ‘‘ground-truthing’’ 
data  gathered  by  researchers  within  the  agency  or  outside  groups. 
The  USGS  also  has  institutional  expertise  in  basic  science  and 
monitoring  capacities  to  augment  carbon  mineralization  research. 
Recently  USGS  established  a  methodology  to  define  and  map  a 
comprehensive  inventory  of  underground  pore  space  in  the  U.S. 
that could be used for mineral sequestration of carbon, such as ba-
salt sands. 

Furthermore,  some  strategies  call  for  the  distribution  of  certain 
chemicals over land or oceans to stimulate processes that consume 
carbon,  either  by  mineralizing  the  carbon  into  a  solid  through 
chemical reactions, by stimulating the growth of carbon-consuming 
organisms,  or  by  increasing  the  ocean’s  capacity  to  store  CO2.  The 
USGS  maintains  the  federal  government’s  most  comprehensive 
commodities survey on mineral resources, and may be needed to in-
form  the  available  quantities  and  ease  of  access  to  specific  mate-
rials,  if  any  of  these  mineral  distribution  strategies  are  deemed  to 
be  scientifically  plausible.  In  addition,  if  climate  engineering  were 
ultimately  deployed,  the  USGS  would  be  needed  to  monitor  pro-
gram  impacts  on  natural  resources.  The  USGS  maintains  a  com-
mitment to scientific integrity and the sharing of information freely 
with  the  public.40 Objective  and  transparent  science  will  be  espe-
cially  critical  for  identifying  and  analyzing  negative  and  unin-
tended consequences on ecosystems that may emerge if climate en-
gineering is deployed. 

40 U.S.  GEOLOGICAL SURVEY,  FUNDAMENTAL SCIENCE PRACTICES (2006).  Available  at  <http:/

/www.usgs.gov/usgs-manual/500/502-1.html>. 

32

The  U.S.  Department  of  State  is  the  best  equipped  federal 
body  to  facilitate  an  international  forum  for  guiding  research  and 
regulation and pursuing intergovernmental consensuses as the dis-
cipline develops. The State Department coordinates cooperative re-
search between the United States and other nations, represents the 
U.S. in international climate negotiations, and also acts as the offi-
cial  point  of  contact  to  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate 
Change  (IPCC).  Furthermore,  the  United  States  Agency  for  Inter-
national Development (USAID), a division of the State Department, 
contributes  funding  to  the  U.S.  Global  Change  Research  Program 
(USGCRP).  While  basic  research  activities  within  U.S.  federal 
agencies may not require participation from the State Department, 
the  potential  impacts  of  climate  engineering  are  necessarily  inter-
national  in  scale.  Those  strategies  that  would  result  in  trans-
boundary  impacts,  such  as  changes  in  monsoon  patterns  and  sun-
light  availability,  would  necessitate  international  coordination  and 
governance  at  an  early  stage.  If  the  United  States  were  to  for-
malize  research  activities  on  climate  engineering,  complementary 
international  discussions  on  regulatory  frameworks  would  be  re-
quired.

ORGANIZATIONAL MODELS 

As noted above, there is growing consensus that a comprehensive 
climate  engineering  research  strategy  would  require  the  engage-
ment  of  a  wide  range  of  disciplines,  and  would  likely  call  for  an 
interagency initiative to coordinate research activities and findings. 
Several models and lessons on interagency coordination are profiled 
below.  However,  any  attempt  to  field  test  or  deploy  large  scale  cli-
mate  engineering  would  likely  require  coordination  at  far  greater 
scales and with international partners.

‘‘In  my  opinion  before  a  nation  (or  the  world)  ever  decided  to  deploy  a  full-
scale  geoengineering  project  . . .  it  would  require  an  enormous  activity, 
equivalent  to  that  presently  occurring  within  the  modeling  and  assessment 
activities  associated  with  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change 
(IPCC)  activities,  or  a  Manhattan  Project,  or  both.  It  would  involve  hun-
dreds  or  thousands  of  scientists  and  engineers  and  require  the  involvement 
of politicians, ethicists, social scientists, and possibly the military.’’

—Dr. Philip Rasch, Geoengineering II: The Scientific Basis and Engineer-

ing Challenges (written hearing testimony) (2010).

Council on Environmental Quality 

The  White  House  Council  on  Environmental  Quality  (CEQ)  co-
ordinates  Federal  environmental  efforts  and  works  closely  with 
agencies and other White House offices in the development of envi-
ronmental  policies  and  initiatives.  The  Council’s  Chairman  also 
serves  as  the  principal  environmental  advisor  to  the  President. 
CEQ  provides  recommendations  on  comprehensive  national  envi-
ronmental  strategies  to  the  President  on  specific  issues,  such  as 
carbon  capture  and  storage,  Gulf  Coast  ecosystem  restoration,  and 
climate change adaptation. The CEQ also has a unique capacity to 
engage a range of stakeholders and balance the competing interests 
among federal agencies and state and local governments. 

33

In pursuit of environmental goals on specific topics, CEQ may es-
tablish  a  task  force  and  other  comprehensive,  interagency  initia-
tives,  when  appropriate.  For  example,  in  June  2009  the  President 
distributed a memorandum to the leaders of executive departments 
and  federal  agencies  establishing  an  Interagency  Ocean  Policy 
Task  force,  to  be  led  by  CEQ.  This  Task  Force  is  charged  with  de-
veloping  recommendations  over  several  government  agencies  on 
how  to  enhance  ocean  stewardship  and  resource  use.  The  Task 
Force  has  since  released  interim  reports,  containing  recommenda-
tions  on  ocean  governance  and  interagency  coordination,  and  re-
ceived  comments  from  a  wide  variety  of  stakeholders.  As  the  na-
tional  and  international  discussion  advances,  it  may  be  helpful  for 
CEQ  to  explore  options  for  a  similarly-structured  body  that  will 
provide  a  forum  for  stakeholder  input  and  early,  foundational  co-
ordination between agencies.

Office of Science and Technology Policy 

The  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy 
(OSTP), established in 1976, advises the President on broad science 
and technology issues, provides scientific assessments to inform Ex-
ecutive  Branch  policies,  and  coordinates  scientific  and  technical 
work  within  the  Executive  Branch.  In  order  to  accomplish  this 
broad  mission,  OSTP  often  hosts  public  and  private  sector  sum-
mits,  issues  reports,  coordinates  activities  within  existing  Commit-
tees and interagency bodies, and publicizes work conducted by fed-
eral  bodies.  OSTP  is  divided  into  four  divisions—Science,  Tech-
nology,  Energy  &  Environment,  and  National  Security  &  Inter-
national  Affairs—each  of  which  could  be  instrumental  in  coordi-
nating  early-stage  climate  engineering  research.  Two  initiatives 
under  OSTP  in  the  last  few  years  may  be  useful  models  for  struc-
turing  a  federal  research  program.  The  National  Nanotechnology 
Initiative,  profiled  below,  and  the  Networking  Information  Tech-
nology  Research  and  Development  (NITR–D)  program  are  both  of 
examples  of  interagency  entities  established  to  address  complex 
and interdisciplinary emerging technologies. 

The  OSTP  also  serves  as  co-chair  of  the  President’s  Council  of 
Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST),  a  council  of  inde-
pendent  experts  that  provide  advice  to  the  President.  Established 
in  2001,  PCAST  consists  of  35  individuals  drawn  from  industry, 
academia,  and  other  nongovernment  organizations,  as  well  as  the 
Director  of  the  OSTP.  The  Council  receives  information  from  the 
private  and  academic  sectors  on  a  variety  of  issues  in  science  and 
technology  and  prepares  recommendations  on  specific  topics,  most 
often  at  the  President’s  request.  While  its  efficacy  and  influence  is 
somewhat fluid and may change over different Presidential admin-
istrations,  PCAST  has  experience  guiding  policy  on  nascent  tech-
nologies. PCAST may be needed to provide the President with reli-
able and independent assessments of how federal policy should best 
regulate climate engineering research.

U.S. Global Change Research Program 

The  U.S.  Global  Change  Research  Program  (USGCRP),  initiated 
in  1989  and  mandated  by  Congress  in  1990,  coordinates  and  inte-

34

grates  federal  research  on  changes  in  the  global  environment  and 
impacts  on  the  public.41 The  program  is  managed  by  the  Com-
mittee  on  Environment  and  Natural  Resources  under  OSTP.  Thir-
teen  federal  departments  and  agencies  participate  in  USGCRP, 
with  the  biggest  contributions  coming  from  DOE,  NOAA,  NASA 
and NSF. USGCRP’s mission is to improve knowledge of earth’s cli-
mate,  environment,  and  natural  and  anthropogenic  variability;  to 
better  understand  the  forces  of  change  in  earth’s  climate  and  re-
lated  systems;  to  predict  and  reduce  uncertainty  in  projections  for 
climate change in the future; understand the sensitivity and adapt-
ability  of  ecosystems  and  human  systems  to  global  change;  and 
manage  risks  and  opportunities  related  to  global  change.  To  sup-
port  these  goals  the  participating  agencies  coordinate  their  activi-
ties through ten Interagency Working Groups that address specific 
challenges  of  climate  change.  The  multi-disciplinary,  coordinated 
structure  of  the  USGCRP  makes  it  an  appropriate  model  for,  and 
possible steward of, climate engineering research. 

incorporating  climate  engineering 

into 
USGCRP’s  jurisdiction  includes  the  creation  of  one  or  more  new 
working  groups  exclusively  focused  on  the  strategies  not  otherwise 
informed by existing USGCRP activities. Another proposal is to ac-
commodate climate engineering within existing working groups ac-
cording to the key research needs associated with particular strate-
gies.  However,  it  has  been  noted  that  an  evaluation  of  USGCRP’s 
successes  and  challenges  would  be  needed  before  attempting  to  in-
corporate  another  large,  comprehensive  agenda  into  this  program. 
There has been some concern that introducing climate engineering 
into  USGCRP’s  jurisdiction  would  draw  resources  and  attention 
away  from  the  primary  Program  mission  of  understanding,  assess-
ing,  predicting  and  responding  to  climate  change  through  mitiga-
tion  and  adaptation  programs.  However,  it  appears  that  a  com-
prehensive  interagency  research  agenda  on  climate  engineering 
would call for participation from the same agencies in the USGCRP 
and would likely be managed under a similar structure.

One  proposal 

for 

U.S. Group on Earth Observations 

The U.S. Group on Earth Observations (USGEO) is charged with 
developing,  coordinating,  and  managing  an  integrated  U.S.  earth-
observation  system  through  ground,  airborne,  and  satellite  meas-
urements.  The  group  was  established  in  2005  under  the  National 
Science and Technology Council’s Committee on Environment, Nat-
ural  Resources,  and  Sustainability  within  the  OSTP.  USGEO  is 
made up of representatives from 17 federal agencies with a role in 
earth observations,42 and is co-chaired by representatives of OSTP, 
NOAA,  and  NASA.  USGEO  also  supports  the  Global  Earth  Obser-
vation System of Systems (GEOSS), an international effort to share 
environmental  data  to  support  decision-making  in  nine  societal 

41 Global Change Research Act, 15 U.S.C. § 2931 et seq. The USGCRP was known as the U.S. 
Climate Change Science Program (CCSP) between 2002 and 2008. Interagency climate research 
and  technology  activities  have  undergone  several  iterations  over  the  last  two  years.  See  gen-
erally  MICHAEL SIMPSON & JOHN JUSTUS,  CLIMATE CHANGE:  FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FOR 
SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY (U.S. Congressional Research Service) (2005). 

42 USGEO  is  comprised  of  all  the  agencies  including  the  USGCRP,  the  Department  of  Home-
land  Security  (DHS),  Centers  for  Disease  Control  and  Prevention  (CDC),  the  Office  of  Manage-
ment and Budget (OMB), and OSTP. 

35

benefit  areas.  The  goal  of  this  initiative  is  to  provide  the  overall 
conceptual  framework  needed  to  move  toward  globally-integrated 
earth  observations.  By  2009,  seventy-nine  countries,  the  European 
Commission  and  several  dozen  international  organizations  had 
joined  the  GEOSS,  which  will  deliver  detailed  and  verifiable  cli-
mate data at local, regional, and global scales. 

In  several  recent  reports  on  the  state  of  U.S.  satellite  systems, 
GAO identified some challenges for USGEO 43—namely, that its re-
quired Strategic Assessment Report on opportunities and priorities 
for  space  observation  has  not  yet  been  approved  by  the  USGEO 
managers  in  OSTP,  and  as  of  July  2010  had  not  scheduled  a  date 
for releasing the final Report. The GAO expressed concern that the 
draft version of this report did not address costs, schedules or plans 
for long-term satellite data needs, and that even once the Strategic 
Report is finalized, it is not clear how the OSTP and Office of Man-
agement and Budget (OMB) will ensure the interagency strategy is 
consistent  with  the  individual  agencies’  plans  and  budgets.  These 
difficulties  demonstrate  that  coordinating  data  sources  between 
federal  agencies,  not  to  mention  between  several  nations,  requires 
careful  planning  and  execution.  Any  successful  inter-agency  effort 
will require open and frequent communication, effective leadership, 
and a clear delineation of responsibilities. 

National Nanotechnology Initiative 

to  coordinate 

The  United  States’  experience  with  nanotechnology  research 
across federal agencies can provide valuable insight into a potential 
federal,  interagency  research  initiative  on  climate  engineering. 
Nanotechnology, the collective term for nano-scale science and tech-
nology  applications,  is  a  nascent  field  that  is  rapidly  attracting 
public  interest  and  investment  around  the  world.  In  2000,  Presi-
dent  Clinton  launched  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative 
(NNI) 
federal  research  and  development  on 
nanotechnology,  and  in  2003,  Congress  enacted  the  21st  Century 
Nanotechnology Research and Development Act 44 to provide a stat-
utory  foundation  and  organize  the  Initiative.  The  America  COM-
PETES  Reauthorization  Act  of  2010,  which  contains  a  number  of 
amendments  to  NNI,  was  approved  by  the  House  in  May  2010.45 
While  nanotechnology  may  eventually  contribute  revolutionary 
advances to any number of public goods, concerns have been raised 
about the potential negative impacts of nanotechnologies on human 
health  and  the  environment.46 For  example,  it  has  been  proposed 
that the small size of nanoscale particles could allow them to pene-
trate and damage human organs, such as the lungs. In its June 2, 
2010  report  the  Congressional  Research  Service  (CRS)  observed 
that public attitudes and perception of risks leaves the still-nascent 

43 See  U.S.  GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE,  ENVIRONMENTAL SATELLITES:  PLANNING 
REQUIRED TO MITIGATE NEAR-TERM RISKS AND ENSURE LONG-TERM CONTINUITY (Publication 
No.  GAO–10–858T)  (2010)  and  U.S.  GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE,  ENVIRONMENTAL 
SATELLITES:  STRATEGY NEEDED TO SUSTAIN CRITICAL CLIMATE AND SPACE WEATHER MEASURE-
MENTS (Publication No. GAO–10–456) (2010).

44 § 15 U.S.C. § 7501 et seq. 
45 H.R. 5116, 111th Cong. (2010). Also see H. REP. NO. 111–478. 
46 See  JOHN F.  SARGENT JR.,  NANOTECHNOLOGY:  A  POLICY PRIMER (U.S.  Congressional  Re-

search Service) (2010). 

36

regulate  and 

enable 

training 

nanotechnology  industry  and  research  community  vulnerable  to  a 
negative event, such as an accidental or harmful release. 

education  and 

The  NNI  is  comprised  of  thirteen  federal  agencies  that  conduct 
nanotechnology research and development and another twelve that 
would 
on 
nanotechnology.  In  addition  to  conducting  research  and  exploring 
regulatory  issues  related  to  the  environmental,  health  and  safety 
issues,  the  NNI  also  conducts  public  outreach  activities  through 
written  materials,  public  meetings,  a  comprehensive  website,  and 
other educational resources to the public. NNI agencies also engage 
with international consortia such as the Organization for Economic 
Cooperation  and  Development  (OECD)  to  address  nano-safety 
issues.  By  recognizing  that  risks  and  impacts  of  nanotechnology 
must be better understood by key stakeholders, and that public ac-
ceptance  is  critical  to  realizing  the  full  benefits  it  may  ultimately 
bring to bear, NNI can serve as a model for what might be needed 
if  climate  engineering  research  is  undertaken  at  the  federal  level. 
It should also be noted that NNI has had an immense impact on 
global  interest  in  nanotechnology.  Before  the  U.S.  initiated  the 
NNI,  nanotechnology  research  worldwide  was  generally  piecemeal 
and  modest.  Since  the  establishment  of  NNI,  over  sixty  countries 
have  initiated  government-led  nanotechnology  programs.  While  a 
heightened  profile  for  technology  development  and  commercializa-
tion has been a positive development for nanotechnology, increased 
interest  in  climate  engineering  may  introduce  new  risks,  such  as 
the  possibility  of  unilateral  deployment.  The  existence  of  a  dedi-
cated  research  program  on  the  part  of  the  U.S.  or  its  partners 
might  serve  to  legitimize  efforts  by  other  nations  to  act  on  their 
own. 

Lastly,  the  NNI  has  had  to  address  the  fundamental  question  of 
what  is  included  in  the  category  of  nanotechnology.  Initially,  fed-
eral agencies were unclear about what activities should be reported 
as  nanotechnology,  and  which  would  instead  qualify  as  chemistry 
or materials science research. The Office of Management and Budg-
et  identified  explicit  criteria  on  nanotechnology  for  the  purposes  of 
quantify  funding  levels  for  research.  International  standards  for 
nanotechnology  also  continue  to  evolve;  for  five  years  the  Inter-
national Standards Organization has been working to identify core 
parameters.  Climate  engineering  would  be  faced  with  a  similar 
challenge.  There  is  no  clear  consensus  as  to  which  strategies  con-
stitute  climate  engineering,  and  for  what  purposes  the  category 
must be defined. For instance, for the purpose of developing regula-
tions and restrictions, the term could be used to apply to a smaller 
set  of  higher-risk  strategies  than  might  otherwise  be  included  for 
the purpose of developing a broad interagency research effort. If re-
search  were  initiated  and  coordinated  at  the  federal  level,  a  more 
consistent  vocabulary  that  takes  into  consideration  the  gaps  in 
funding,  research,  risk  assessment,  and  governance  would  be  re-
quired.

National Academy of Public Administration 

The  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  (NAPA)  is  a 
non-profit and non-partisan coalition of management and organiza-
tional  experts  chartered  by  Congress  to  improve  the  effectiveness 

37

of public programs. NAPA was established in 1967 and advises fed-
eral  agencies,  Congress,  state  and  local  governments,  academia, 
and various foundations on how to manage the structure, adminis-
tration,  operation  and  performance  of  existing  programs  and  helps 
identify potential emerging management challenges. NAPA also as-
sesses  the  proposed  effectiveness,  structure,  administration,  and 
implications  for  proposed  public  programs,  policies,  and  processes 
and recommends specific changes to improve the proposed program. 
The NAPA coalition of experts is comprised of several hundred Fel-
lows  with  robust  and  varied  management  experience,  including 
former  members  of  Congress,  governors  and  mayors,  business  ex-
ecutives, foundation executives, and academia. 

NAPA  carries  out  activities  both  at  its  own  discretion  and  by 
Congressional  request.  For  example,  NAPA  recently  completed  a 
congressionally mandated study 47 on structuring a NOAA Climate 
Service.48 A  Climate  Service  would  coordinate  and  distribute  cli-
mate  change  information  gleaned  from  a  variety  of  research  pro-
grams  and  monitoring  systems  to  aid  the  public  and  local,  state, 
and federal decision makers. While the overall goal of a NOAA Cli-
mate  Service  is  very  different  than  a  potential  coordinated  climate 
engineering  research  strategy,  the  two  would  share  a  number  of 
key  objectives  and  challenges.  Both  must  gather  information  and 
expertise  from  a  wide  range  of  sources  and  organize  and  dissemi-
nate  it  in  a  consistent  and  usable  format  and  both  must  leverage 
specific  program  office  strengths  and  ensure  stakeholder  commu-
nication.  NAPA  has  explored  these  topics  in  great  detail,  as  well 
as  how  private,  university,  and  non-governmental  organizations 
might  contribute  to  data  holdings  and  communication  efforts,  how 
the proposed NOAA Climate Service would help support public un-
derstanding  and  inter-user  dialogue,  and  how  to  increase  usability 
of  existing  climate  data.  With  its  established  format  for  exploring 
these considerations, as well as a robust body of work consisting of 
other  relevant  independent  projects  and  publications,  NAPA  may 
be  needed  to  study  in  greater  depth  the  potential  organizational 
tools  and  other  useful  model  programs  that  could  support  and  in-
form a climate engineering program. 

GENERAL FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS

Immediacy 

In  The  Regulation  of  Geoengineering  report,  the  U.K.  Committee 
recommended  that  serious  consideration  of  the  regulatory  frame-
works  for  climate  engineering  technologies  start  now,  and  not  be 
delayed  until  either  highly  disruptive  effects  of  climate  change  are 
observed  or  deployment  of  a  climate  engineering  scheme  is  under-
way.  Similarly,  a  robust  understanding  of  the  potential  environ-
mental impacts will be needed in advance of a ‘‘climate emergency’’ 
so that the most effective and risk-averse strategies are well under-
stood. It is the opinion of the Chair that broad consideration 
of  comprehensive  and  multi-disciplinary  climate  engineer-

47 H. REP. NOS. 111–366 of P.L. 111–117 (2009). 
48 See  Expanding  Climate  Services  at  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration 
(NOAA):  Developing  the  National  Climate  Service  Hearing  Before  the  House  of  Representatives 
Committee on Science and Technology, 111th Cong. (2009) (Hearing Charter).

38

ing research at the federal level begin as soon as possible in 
order  to  ensure  scientific  preparedness  for  future  climate 
events.

Defining Climate Engineering 

At  this  time,  the  definitional  boundaries  between  some  climate 
engineering strategies and traditional mitigation remain unclear. It 
is  generally  agreed  that  ‘‘climate  engineering’’  or  ‘‘geoengineering’’ 
implies a willful intent to produce meaningful impacts on the global 
climate.49 In contrast, while human activities have already greatly 
impacted our global climate, they were not undertaken for that ex-
press  purpose.  However,  what  remains  unclear  is  how  activities 
should be distinguished from traditional mitigation and adaptation, 
and at what scale of application they amount to ‘‘climate engineer-
ing.’’  Many  of  these  activities  are  already  being  undertaken  at 
smaller  scales,  whether  or  not  for  the  express  goal  of  reflecting 
solar  radiation  or  absorbing  greenhouse  gases.  For  example,  refor-
estation  in  pursuit  of  environmental  and  public  goods,  other  than 
carbon  management,  has  existed  for  hundreds  of  years.  Some  ex-
perts  argue  that  CDR  strategies  should  not  be  designated  as  cli-
mate  engineering  because,  like  traditional  mitigation,  they  seek  to 
manage  climate  change  by  reducing  atmospheric  concentrations  of 
greenhouse  gases.  Still  others  argue  that  CDR  does  belong  in  the 
category  of  climate  engineering  as  it  distracts  from  the  primary 
goal  of  mitigation  through  emissions  reductions.  As  climate  engi-
neering  will  likely  remain  a  controversial  topic,  the  designation 
itself  may  provoke  a  negative  public  opinion  or  even  inappropri-
ately  strict  regulation  on  relatively  low-risk  strategies.  A  morato-
rium  on  all  climate  engineering  ‘‘activities,’’  for  example,  without 
an adequate scientific basis for what specific strategies and at what 
scales  fall  under  this  definition,  could  effectively  ban  low-risk  and 
commonplace activities such as small-scale afforestation. 

Furthermore,  uncertainty  about  what  research  activities  fall 
under  the  climate  engineering  umbrella  may  create  challenges  for 
agencies,  Congress,  and  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget 
(OMB)  in  determining  appropriate  funding  levels  for  these  activi-
ties. When the United States first began to coordinate federal work 
on  nanoscience  and  explore  the  aggregate  of  existing  federal  re-
search, agencies were uncertain as to which activities could be clas-
sified  as  nanotechnology,  and  would  often  report  their  nano-scale 
research  activities  as  materials  science  or  basic  chemistry.  Only 
after OMB established explicit guidelines for what might fall under 
the umbrella of ‘‘nanotechnology’’ was there a clearer picture of ex-
isting  capacities  in  the  federal  agencies.  Certainly  if  climate  engi-
neering research is formally authorized by the federal government, 
a more certain definition will be required to help U.S. agencies, and 
ultimately  the  international  community,  identify  their  relevant  re-
search  activities.  The  GAO’s  efforts  to  quantify  existing  federal  ef-
forts in its October 2010 report provide a useful foundation for this 
process. 

49 INNOVATIVE ENERGY STRATEGIES FOR CO2 STABILIZATION p.412 (Robert G. Watts, ed., Cam-

bridge University Press) (2002). 

39

At this time, a consistent and comprehensive definition of climate 
engineering may not be feasible. For the purposes of organizing re-
search,  potential  strategies  should  be  considered  on  a  case-by-case 
basis,  accommodating  the  political,  environmental,  and  social  risks 
associated  with  them.  Furthermore,  as  noted  earlier  and  used 
throughout  this  report,  the  term  ‘‘climate  engineering’’  is  a  more 
appropriate  tool  for  communicating  the  concept  to  policymakers 
and  the  public  than  ‘‘geoengineering.’’  It  is  the  opinion  of  the 
Chair  that  there  must  ultimately  be  an  international  con-
sensus  on  climate  engineering  terminology  that  will  best 
communicate  the  strategies  and  desired  effects  to  the  sci-
entific community, policy makers, and the public.

In addition, there has been considerable discussion as to whether 
techniques  designed  for  the  purposes  of  altering  specific  weather 
event,  rather  than  the  larger  climate,  should  fall  under  the  defini-
tion  of  climate  engineering.  The  express  goal  of  weather  modifica-
tion  techniques,  such  as  cloud  seeding,  is  to  impact  weather  pat-
terns,  such  as  hurricane  intensity  and  precipitation,  on  a  geo-
graphically limited scale and with little or no lasting effectiveness. 
It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair,  and  in  agreement  with  the 
U.K.  Committee,50 that  weather  modification  techniques 
such as cloud seeding should not be included within the def-
inition of climate engineering.

Defining a ‘‘Climate Emergency’’

As previously noted, it is the opinion of the Chair that some SRM 
strategies  such  as  stratospheric  injections,  if  proven  viable,  should 
be  reserved  as  an  option  of  last  resort  to  be  used  only  in  the  case 
of  a  ‘‘climate  emergency,’’  and  when  other  options  have  been  ex-
hausted. The majority of stakeholders appear to agree that climate 
engineering  should  not  be  considered  an  alternative  to  stringent 
emissions reductions, and, if deployed, SRM should be used only as 
a  temporary  measure.  Experts  predict  that  large-scale  SRM  meth-
ods,  if  prepared  in  advance,  could  be  deployed  very  quickly  and 
would exert a nearly immediate impact on global albedo. However, 
as the National Research Council notes in its report America’s Cli-
mate  Choices:  Advancing  the  Science  of  Climate  Change,  if  the  in-
tended strategy is to withhold SRM until a dangerous tipping point 
is  imminent,  there  must  be  some  collective  understanding  of  what 
constitutes  such  a  tipping  point  ahead  of  time.  At  this  time  there 
is  no  consensus  on  what  events  would  constitute  a  ‘‘climate  emer-
gency,’’  and  there  is  much  to  consider  about  the  complexity  of  the 
climate system, the potentially long timescales over which an emer-
gency  might  occur,  and  the  global  tolerance  of  climate  changes  in 
defining  the  term.51 Furthermore,  because  the  impacts  of  climate 
engineering  are  not  yet  well-understood,  it  is  not  clear  how  a  par-
ticular strategy might be used to offset specific impacts if a climate 

50 SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, UNITED KINGDOM HOUSE OF COMMONS, THE REGU-

LATION OF GEOENGINEERING p.16 (Stationery Office Limited) (2010).

51 DIVISION ON EARTH AND LIFE SCIENCES, NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL, AMERICA’S CLIMATE 
CHOICES:  ADVANCING THE SCIENCE OF CLIMATE CHANGE p.299  (National  Academies  Press) 
(2010). 

40

emergency  did  arise.52 It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  the 
global  climate  science  and  policy  communities  should  work 
towards  a  consensus  on  what  constitutes  a  ‘‘climate  emer-
gency’’ warranting deployment of SRM technologies.

Categories of Climate Engineering 

In  The  Regulation  of  Geoengineering,53 the  U.K.  Committee  rec-
ommended  that  because  climate  engineering  as  currently  defined 
covers such a broad range of CDR and SRM technologies and tech-
niques,  any  regulatory  framework  for  climate  engineering  cannot 
be  uniform.  Similarly,  the  associated  research  needs  vary  greatly 
among  the  different  suggested  strategies.  While  general  climate 
science  information  today  could  likely  inform  all  climate  engineer-
ing  strategies,  the  anticipated  ecological  impacts  and  scientific 
basis  for  a  particular  strategy  would  require  a  unique  and  focused 
set  of  research  priorities.  Many  CDR  activities,  for  example,  have 
a  sizable  scientific  foundation  from  related  research  activities, 
while SRM has not been tested at any meaningful scale in the field 
or  in  a  laboratory.  The  divergent  and  unique  research  needs  for 
CDR  and  SRM  must  be  accounted  for  when  research  activities  are 
authorized in various federal agencies and program offices. 

‘‘[A] solar radiation management (SRM) R&D program should be organized 
separately  from  the  air  capture  (AC)  R&D  program.  Exploring  SRM  entails 
tasks  that  differ  from  those  needed  to  explore  AC.  Disparate  tasks  demand 
disparate  skills.  Also,  if  research  on  AC  were  ever  to  be  successful  it  might 
well  devolve  to  the  private  sector;  whereas,  SRM  is  likely  to  remain  under 
direct  government  control.  Yoking  together  two  such  different  efforts  would 
be certain to impede the progress of both.’’

—Mr.  Lee  Lane,  Geoengineering:  Assessing  the  Implications  of  Large-

Scale Climate Intervention (responses to questions for the record) (2009).

Geographically Localized Climate Engineering 

Several  witnesses  and  outside  academic  experts  have  explored 
the possibility of climate engineering to address only geographically 
specific areas. This strategy is intended to protect specific environ-
mental  features  that  are  particularly  sensitive  to  climate  change 
and/or  pivotal  elements  of  global  sustainability.  It  has  been  sug-
gested that localized climate engineering could offer more ‘‘bang for 
the buck,’’ requiring a smaller, somewhat more controlled scale op-
eration to produce appreciable positive impacts.

Isolating  the  Ice  Caps? The  impacts  of  climate  change  on  the  polar  ice 
caps  is  of  great  concern,  not  only  because  melting  will  contribute  to  major 
sea level rises, threatening low-altitude coastal communities, but because the 
ice  contains  vast  stores  of  frozen  methane,  a  potent  greenhouse  gas.  Melting 
could  cause  the  release  of  huge  quantities  of  methane,  warming  the  climate 
further  and  encouraging  dangerous  feedback  loops.  Some  scientists  have 
suggested  that  SRM  could  be  somewhat  localized  to  help  protect  polar  ice 
and to prevent such feedback loops.

52 David  Victor,  et  al.,  The  Geoengineering  Option:  A  Last  Resort  Against  Global  Warming?, 

March/April FOREIGN AFFAIRS p.5 (2009).

53 SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, UNITED KINGDOM HOUSE OF COMMONS, THE REGU-

LATION OF GEOENGINEERING p.16 (Stationery Office Limited) (2010).

41

However,  as  Dr.  Shepherd  of  the  Royal  Society  noted,  ‘‘It  would 
.
.
.  be  generally  undesirable  to  attempt  to  localize  SRM  methods, 
because any localized radiative forcing would need to be proportion-
ally  larger  to  achieve  the  same  global  effect,  and  this  is  likely  to 
induce modifications to normal spatial patterns of weather systems 
including  winds,  clouds,  precipitation  and  ocean  currents  and 
upwelling patterns.’’ 54 

At  this  time  there  is  no  consensus  on  the  likelihood  that  geo-
graphically  localized  applications  would  work  as  desired  and  with-
out  unacceptable  secondary  consequences.  However,  models  have 
suggested  that  while  the  global  ecosystem  is  highly  interconnected 
and no large-scale intervention can be isolated, the desired and un-
anticipated  impacts  of  some  strategies  would  be  maximized  at  the 
location  in  which  they  are  deployed.55 Therefore,  it  is  the  opin-
ion  of  the  Chair  that  a  climate  engineering  research  pro-
gram  should  explore  the  unique  range  of  possibilities  and 
risks  associated  with  geographically  localized  climate  engi-
neering.  Furthermore,  any  proposed  application  of  climate 
engineering  to  protect  polar  ice  specifically  should  be  re-
viewed  by  the  Arctic  Council,  an  intergovernmental  forum 
representing the world’s circumpolar nations.

Space-Based Reflectors 

One suggested climate engineering proposal entails placing large-
scale sunlight deflectors in space to reduce the amount of solar en-
ergy  reaching  the  earth.  Some  suggestions  include  a  great  number 
of reflective surfaces, mirrors, or light-colored materials, in a near-
earth  orbit,  or  a  lesser  number  of  reflectors  positioned  at  the  L–1 
point, also referred to as a LaGrange point, where the gravitational 
attractions  of  the  earth  and  sun  are  equal.  Development  and  de-
ployment  costs  of  such  strategies  are  projected  to  be  extremely 
high,  as  they  would  require  the  development  of  new  technologies 
likely  much  larger  in  scale  and  far  more  complex  than  any  space 
program ever attempted.56 For this reason project development and 
deployment is also estimated to take several decades, making it an 
unviable  option  for  rapid  deployment  in  an  emergency  situation. 
Also, solar applications represent potentially the most serious type 
of the ‘‘termination problem,’’ in which the intentional or accidental 
termination  of  SRM  activities  could  result  in  a  rapid  and  poten-
tially  catastrophic  increase  in  global  temperatures  unless  strict, 
congruent controls on greenhouse gases had been undertaken while 
the  solar  applications  were  in  effect.  An  international  team  of  sci-
entists recently reported that space-based reflectors would do little 
to combat rising sea levels, as sea levels respond slowly to changes 

54 STAFF OF HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,  111TH 
CONG., REPORT ON GEOENGINEERING: ASSESSING THE IMPLICATIONS OF A LARGE SCALE CLIMATE 
INTERVENTION HEARING (COMM. PRINT 2009). 

55 STAFF OF HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,  111TH 
CONG.,  REPORT ON GEOENGINEERING II:  THE SCIENTIFIC BASIS AND ENGINEERING CHALLENGES 
HEARING (COMM. PRINT 2010).

56 See  JOHN SHEPHERD ET AL.,  GEOENGINEERING THE CLIMATE:  SCIENCE,  GOVERNANCE AND 

UNCERTAINTY p.34 (THE U.K. ROYAL SOCIETY) (2009). 

42

in  the  earth’s  atmosphere.57 Furthermore,  like  all  SRM  strategies, 
space-based  reflectors  would  do  nothing  to  address  the  problem  of 
ocean acidification. 

In addition, there is considerable agreement among climate engi-
neering  experts  and  international  policy  analysts  that  deployment 
of  space-based  reflectors  would  introduce  an  extremely  precipitous 
geopolitical  scenario.  Space-based  applications  would  likely  have 
considerable impacts on all earth systems, including effects on pre-
cipitation  patterns  and  agricultural  yields.  However,  the  system 
would  likely  be  controlled  by  a  single,  technologically-sophisticated 
group. In such a scenario a host of legal issues would arise regard-
ing  the  negative  environmental  changes  caused,  or  perceived  to  be 
caused,  by  the  reflectors.58 This  scenario  would  complicate  both 
public  acceptance  and  international  agreement  on  how  such  a 
project should be undertaken, and run counter to the U.K. and U.S. 
Committees’ objectives of forming sufficient international consensus 
and giving equitable consideration to third world interests. There-
fore, it is the opinion of the Chair that due to high projected 
costs,  technological  infeasibility  and  unacceptable  environ-
mental  and  political  risks,  the  solar  radiation  management 
(SRM)  strategy  of  space-based  mirrors  should  be  a  low  pri-
ority consideration for research.

Mirrors  in  Space ‘‘The  space  sunshade  concept  is  an  unappealing  ap-
proach  to  SRM.  It  offers  few  benefits  that  might  not  be  achieved  at  vastly 
lower  costs  with  other  SRM  techniques,  and  the  very  large  up-front  infra-
structure  costs  would  simply  be  so  much  waste  if  the  project  were  to  be  fail 
or be abandoned for any reason.’’

—Dr.  Lee  Lane,  Geoengineering:  Assessing  the  Implications  of  Large-

Scale Climate Intervention (responses to questions for the record) (2009).

Desert-Based Reflectors 

Another  proposal  is  to  cover  large  spans  of  desert  with  white  or 
reflective  materials  to  greatly  increase  the  local  albedo,  therefore 
decreasing  the  overall  global  solar  intake.  Its  proponents  would 
argue that landforms unsuited to agriculture or human inhabitance 
may  be  suitable  for  SRM.  However,  as  the  Royal  Society  noted  in 
its  report,  this  strategy  would  certainly  conflict  with  other  desir-
able land uses and may cause great ecological damage to the desert 
ecosystem.  Furthermore,  as  the  application  itself  would  be  highly 
localized, some of the unintended effects would also be highly local-
ized,  causing  potentially  severe  changes  in  atmospheric  circulation 
and precipitation patterns. Each of the expert witnesses appearing 
before  the  Committee  that  addressed  this  proposal  expressed  sig-
nificant  doubts  about  the  potential  merits  and  technological  feasi-
bility of such a policy. As Dr. Robert Jackson noted in his responses 
to Committee questions:

‘‘This  suggestion  [of  desert-based  reflectors]  strikes  me  as  a 
poor  idea,  environmentally  and  scientifically.  Deserts  are 

57 J.C.  Moore  et  al.,  Efficacy  of  Geoengineering  to  Limit  21st  Century  Sea-level  Rise,  10.1073/
pnas.1008153107, PROCEEDINGS OF THE NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES (published online Aug. 
23, 2010). Available at <http://www.pnas.org/content/107/36/15699>. 

58 CLAIRE L.  PARKINSON,  COMING CLIMATE CRISIS? CONSIDER THE PAST,  BEWARE THE BIG FIX 

(Rowman and Littlefield Publishers, Inc.) (2010).

43

.

unique  ecosystems  with  a  diverse  array  of  life.  They  are  not  a 
wasteland  to  be  covered  over  and  forgotten.  Based  on  the  best 
science  available,  I  believe  that  placing  reflective  shields  over 
desert  .
.  is  likely  to  be  both  unsustainable  and  harmful  to 
native  species  and  ecosystems.  Take  as  one  example  the  sug-
gestion to use a reflective polyethylene-aluminum surface. This 
shield  would  alter  almost  every  fundamental  aspect  of  the  na-
tive  habitat,  from  the  amount  of  sunlight  received  (by  defini-
tion) to the way that rainfall reaches the ground. Implemented 
over  the  millions  of  acres  required  to  make  a  difference  to  cli-
mate,  such  a  shield  could  also  alter  cloud  cover,  weather,  and 
many other important factors.’’ 59 

Therefore  it  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  due  to  wide 
array of potentially harmful impacts on ecosystems, such as 
water  cycles  and  wildlife,  the  solar  radiation  management 
(SRM)  strategy  of  desert-based  reflectors  should  be  a  low 
priority consideration for research.

International Collaboration 

International  collaboration  on  climate  engineering  is  key.  The 
U.S.  Science  and  Technology  Committee  began  its  consideration  of 
climate  engineering  upon  meeting  with  the  then-Chair  of  the  U.K. 
Science  and  Technology  Committee,  MP  Phil  Willis,  in  April  2009. 
Chair  Willis  and  Chairman  Gordon  agreed  to  work  together  on  a 
joint  inquiry  into  climate  engineering,  and  each  Committee  initi-
ated  public  hearings  to  establish  a  public  record  through  expert 
testimony  on  the  subject.  The  U.K.  Committee  published  a  com-
prehensive report on its findings on March 18, 2010.

It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair,  in  agreement  with  U.K. 
Committee,60 that  further  collaborative  work  between  na-
tional  legislatures  on  topics  with  international  reach,  such 
as  climate  engineering,  should  be  pursued.  The  Chair  also 
agrees  that  there  are  a  range  of  measures  that  could  be 
taken  to  streamline  the  process  and  enhance  the  effective-
ness of collaboration. 

It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair,  in  agreement  with  the  U.K. 
Committee,61 that  the  U.S.  Government  should  press  for  an 
international  database  of  climate  engineering  research  to 
encourage and facilitate transparency and open publication 
of results. 

It  is  the  opinion  of  the  Chair  that  others  topics  such  as 
synthetic  biology,  nanotechnology,  and  strategic  raw  mate-
rials may be of international significance and mutual inter-
est  to  the  U.S.  and  U.K.  committees,  and  that  these  topics 
may  be  appropriate  for  bilateral  or  multilateral  collabora-
tion in the future.

59 STAFF OF HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,  111TH 
CONG.,  REPORT ON GEOENGINEERING II:  THE SCIENTIFIC BASIS AND ENGINEERING CHALLENGES 
HEARING (COMM. PRINT 2010).

60 SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, UNITED KINGDOM HOUSE OF COMMONS, THE REGU-

LATION OF GEOENGINEERING p.47 (Stationery Office Limited) (2010).

61 Id. at p.32.

44

It is the opinion of the Chair that this joint inquiry should 
serve  as  a  model  for  future  inter-Committee  collaboration 
between  the  U.S.  and  the  U.K.  or  other  inter-Parliamentary 
partnerships.

45

ADDITIONAL SOURCES
Challenges of Our Own Making, 465 NATURE p.397 (2010).
Scott  Barrett,  The  Incredible  Economics  of  Geoengineering,  39  EN-

VIRONMENTAL AND RESOURCE ECONOMICS p.45 (2008).

J.J. BLACKSTOCK ET AL., CLIMATE ENGINEERING RESPONSES TO CLI-
MATE EMERGENCIES (Novim)  (2009).  Available  at  <http://
arvix/org/pdf/0907.5140>.

J.G.  Canadell  &  M.R.  Raupach,  Managing  forests  for  climate 

change mitigation, 320 SCIENCE p.1456 (2008).

Ralph  J.  Cicerone,  Geoengineering:  Encouraging  Research  and 
Overseeing Implementation, 77 CLIMATIC CHANGE p.221 (2006).
JAMES R.  FLEMING,  FIXING THE SKY:  THE CHECKERED HISTORY OF 
WEATHER AND CLIMATE CONTROL (Columbia  University  Press) 
(2010).

MICHAEL GARSTANG ET AL., COMMITTEE ON THE STATUS OF AND FU-
TURE DIRECTIONS IN U.S.  WEATHER MODIFICATION RESEARCH 
AND OPERATIONS,  NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL,  CRITICAL 
ISSUES IN WEATHER MODIFICATION RESEARCH (The  National 
Academies Press) (2003).

P.Y.  Groisman,  Possible  Regional  Climate  Consequences  of  the 
Pinatubo  Eruption:  An  Empirical  Approach,  19  GEOPHYSICAL 
RESEARCH LETTERS p.1603 (1992).

ELI KINTISCH,  HACK THE PLANET:  SCIENCE’S BEST HOPE—OR 
WORST NIGHTMARE—FOR AVERTING CLIMATE CATASTROPHE 
(John Wiley & Sons, Inc.) (2010).

RICHARD LATTANZIO & EMILY BARBOUR,  MEMORANDUM REGARDING 
INTERNATIONAL GOVERNANCE OF GEOENGINEERING (U.S.  Con-
gressional Research Service) (2010).

Michael  C.  MacCracken,  Geoengineering:  Getting  a  Start  on  a  Pos-
sible  Insurance  Policy,  INTERNATIONAL SEMINAR ON NUCLEAR 
WAR AND PLANETARY EMERGENCIES—40TH SESSION p.747 
(2008).

Colin  Macilwain,  Talking  the  Talk:  Without  Effective  Public  En-
gagement,  There  Will  Be  No  Synthetic  biology  in  Europe,  465 
NATURE p.867 (2010).

Daniel  M.  Murphy,  Effect  of  Stratospheric  Aerosols  on  Direct  Sun-
light and Implications for Concentrating Solar Power, 43 ENVI-
RONMENTAL SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY p.2784 (2009).

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION,  RESPONDING 
TO THE CHALLENGE OF CLIMATE AND ENVIRONMENTAL CHANGE: 
NASA’S PLAN FOR A CLIMATE-CENTRIC ARCHITECTURE FOR 
EARTH OBSERVATIONS AND APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE (2010).

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION, NASA FISCAL 

YEAR 2011 BUDGET ESTIMATES (2010).

NATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL RESEARCH COUNCIL,  EXPERIMENT 
EARTH? REPORT ON A PUBLIC DIALOGUE ON GEOENGINEERING 
(Ipsos  Mori  Publications) 
(2010).  Available  at  <http://
www.ipsosmori.com/researchpublications/publications/publi-
cation.aspx?oItemId=1376>.

Alan  Robock,  20  Reasons  Why  Geoengineering  May  Be  a  Bad  Idea, 

May/June BULLETIN OF THE ATOMIC SCIENTISTS (2008).

46

U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY, REPORT OF THE INTER-
AGENCY TASK FORCE ON CARBON CAPTURE AND STORAGE 
(2010).  Available  at  <http://www.epa.gov/climatechange/
downloads/CCS-Task-Force-Report-2010.pdf>.

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE, POLAR-ORBITING ENVI-
RONMENTAL SATELLITES: AGENCIES MUST ACT QUICKLY TO AD-
DRESS RISKS THAT JEOPARDIZE THE CONTINUITY OF WEATHER 
AND CLIMATE DATA (Publication No. GAO 10–558) (2010).

T.M.L. Wigley, A Combined Mitigation/Geoengineering Approach to 

Climate Change, 314 SCIENCE p.452 (2006). 

Appendix: 

UNITED STATES–UNITED KINGDOM JOINT AGREEMENT

(47)

48

49

50

51

Æ

